4904 | risky (adjective): involving risk or danger | loc: riskli
  EN TS: Those chairs look a bit risky.
  tr TS: Şu sandalyeler biraz riskli duruyor.
  EN FS: Those tables look a bit risky.
  tr FS: Şu masalar biraz riskli duruyor.
  EN TP: a risky stack of chairs
  tr TP: riskli bir sandalye yığını
  EN FP: a risky bet on horses
  tr FP: atlara riskli bir bahis
4905 | span (verb): to cover or extend over an area | loc: üzerinden geçmek
  EN TS: The bridge spans the canyon.
  tr TS: Köprü kanyonun üzerinden geçiyor.
  EN FS: The bridge spans the street.
  tr FS: Köprü caddenin üzerinden geçiyor.
  EN TP: arches spanning a canyon
  tr TP: kanyonun üzerinden geçen kemerler
  EN FP: a short attention span
  tr FP: kısa bir dikkat süresi
4906 | tent (noun): a shelter of cloth stretched over poles | loc: çadır
  EN TS: The tent is the only survivor.
  tr TS: Hayatta kalan tek şey çadır.
  EN FS: The arch is the only survivor.
  tr FS: Hayatta kalan tek şey kemer.
  EN TP: a white party tent
  tr TP: beyaz bir parti çadırı
  EN FP: a tent in the woods
  tr FP: ormanda bir çadır
4907 | speaker (noun): a device that converts signals into sounds | loc: hoparlör
  EN TS: Big speaker, dancing water.
  tr TS: Dev hoparlör, dans eden su.
  EN FS: Big speaker, dancing milk.
  tr FS: Dev hoparlör, dans eden süt.
  EN TP: a big club speaker
  tr TP: büyük bir kulüp hoparlörü
  EN FP: a speaker at a conference
  tr FP: konferansta bir konuşmacı
4908 | branch (noun): a stem growing out from a plant's main stem | loc: dal
  EN TS: Someone is bending a branch.
  tr TS: Biri bir dalı büküyor.
  EN FS: Someone is cutting a branch.
  tr FS: Biri bir dalı kesiyor.
  EN TP: bending an apple branch
  tr TP: elma dalını bükmek
  EN FP: a branch of a bank
  tr FP: bir banka şubesi
4909 | famous (adjective): widely known and admired by people | loc: ünlü
  EN TS: People are filming her like she is famous.
  tr TS: Herkes onu ünlüymüş gibi çekiyor.
  EN FS: People are painting her like she is famous.
  tr FS: Herkes onu ünlüymüş gibi resmediyor.
  EN TP: famous for a minute
  tr TP: bir dakikalığına ünlü
  EN FP: famous for her songs
  tr FP: şarkılarıyla ünlü
4910 | scarf (noun): a long piece of cloth you wear around your neck | loc: atkı
  EN TS: He is screaming in his team scarf!
  tr TS: Takım atkısıyla bağırıyor!
  EN FS: He is sleeping in his team scarf!
  tr FS: Takım atkısıyla uyuyor!
  EN TP: a striped team scarf
  tr TP: çizgili bir takım atkısı
  EN FP: a warm winter scarf
  tr FP: sıcak bir kışlık atkı
4911 | owner (noun): someone who owns a business | loc: sahip
  EN TS: She is the new owner!
  tr TS: Yeni sahibi bu kadın!
  EN FS: He is the new owner!
  tr FS: Yeni sahibi bu adam!
  EN TP: the new cafe owner
  tr TP: kafenin yeni sahibi
  EN FP: the new cafe cook
  tr FP: kafenin yeni aşçısı
4912 | instructor (noun): a person whose job is teaching | loc: eğitmen
  EN TS: The instructor is kicking.
  tr TS: Eğitmen tekme atıyor.
  EN FS: The instructor is dancing.
  tr FS: Eğitmen dans ediyor.
  EN TP: a karate instructor
  tr TP: bir karate eğitmeni
  EN FP: a driving instructor
  tr FP: bir direksiyon eğitmeni
4913 | bracelet (noun): a band wrapped around the wrist | loc: bileklik
  EN TS: She is fastening a bracelet.
  tr TS: Bir bileklik takıyor.
  EN FS: She is fastening a necklace.
  tr FS: Bir kolye takıyor.
  EN TP: a woven beaded bracelet
  tr TP: boncuklu örgü bir bileklik
  EN FP: buying a gold bracelet
  tr FP: altın bir bileklik almak
4914 | guitar (noun): a stringed instrument with six strings | loc: gitar
  EN TS: Everyone loves the guitar guy.
  tr TS: Herkes gitar çalan çocuğa bayılıyor.
  EN FS: Everyone loves the drum guy.
  tr FS: Herkes davul çalan çocuğa bayılıyor.
  EN TP: playing an acoustic guitar
  tr TP: akustik gitar çalmak
  EN FP: fixing an acoustic guitar
  tr FP: akustik gitar tamir etmek
4915 | shoulder (noun): the body part between the neck and the arm | loc: omuz
  EN TS: They are walking shoulder to shoulder.
  tr TS: Omuz omuza yürüyorlar.
  EN FS: They are sitting shoulder to shoulder.
  tr FS: Omuz omuza oturuyorlar.
  EN TP: arms over shoulders
  tr TP: omuzlarda kollar
  EN FP: a bag on the shoulder
  tr FP: omuzda bir çanta
4916 | bicycle (noun): a vehicle with two wheels moved by pedals | loc: bisiklet
  EN TS: We made it! Two bicycles, one sunset.
  tr TS: Başardık! İki bisiklet, bir gün batımı.
  EN FS: We made it! Two scooters, one sunset.
  tr FS: Başardık! İki scooter, bir gün batımı.
  EN TP: bicycles on a pier
  tr TP: iskelede bisikletler
  EN FP: bicycles on a train
  tr FP: trende bisikletler
4917 | shoot (verb): to hit something with a missile from a weapon | loc: ateş etmek
  EN TS: Red shot blue. Gotcha!
  tr TS: Kırmızı maviye ateş etti. Yakalandın!
  EN FS: Blue shot red. Gotcha!
  tr FS: Mavi kırmızıya ateş etti. Yakalandın!
  EN TP: shooting paint at a player
  tr TP: oyuncuya boyayla ateş etmek
  EN FP: shooting a basketball
  tr FP: basket atışı yapmak
4918 | stairs (noun): a flight of steps | loc: merdiven
  EN TS: He is climbing the stairs.
  tr TS: Merdivenleri çıkıyor.
  EN FS: He is sliding down the stairs.
  tr FS: Merdivenlerden kayarak iniyor.
  EN TP: up the stairs with bags
  tr TP: çantalarla merdivenden yukarı
  EN FP: down the stairs alone
  tr FP: tek başına merdivenden aşağı
4919 | membership (noun): being a member of a group | loc: üyelik
  EN TS: She signed up for membership.
  tr TS: Üyelik için kaydoldu.
  EN FS: She signed up for yoga.
  tr FS: Yoga için kaydoldu.
  EN TP: a photo club membership
  tr TP: fotoğraf kulübü üyeliği
  EN FP: a gym membership card
  tr FP: spor salonu üyelik kartı
4920 | community (noun): people from one area who do things together | loc: topluluk
  EN TS: The community is cheering!
  tr TS: Topluluk tezahürat yapıyor!
  EN FS: The community is crying!
  tr FS: Topluluk ağlıyor!
  EN TP: a community garden sign
  tr TP: topluluk bahçesi tabelası
  EN FP: an online community
  tr FP: çevrimiçi bir topluluk
4921 | trail (noun): a rough path through the countryside | loc: patika
  EN TS: The trail is full of roots.
  tr TS: Patika köklerle dolu.
  EN FS: The trail is full of snow.
  tr FS: Patika karla dolu.
  EN TP: a rough forest trail
  tr TP: engebeli bir orman patikası
  EN FP: a trail of footprints
  tr FP: bir ayak izi dizisi
4922 | host (noun): the person who invites guests and cares for them | loc: ev sahibi
  EN TS: The host welcomes his guests.
  tr TS: Ev sahibi misafirlerini karşılıyor.
  EN FS: The host ignores his guests.
  tr FS: Ev sahibi misafirlerini görmezden geliyor.
  EN TP: a host raising his glass
  tr TP: kadeh kaldıran ev sahibi
  EN FP: a talk show host
  tr FP: bir talk show sunucusu
4923 | seat (verb): to show someone to a seat | loc: oturtmak
  EN TS: She is seating two guests.
  tr TS: İki misafiri masaya oturtuyor.
  EN FS: She is seating four guests.
  tr FS: Dört misafiri masaya oturtuyor.
  EN TP: seating a young couple
  tr TP: genç bir çifti masaya oturtmak
  EN FP: seating herself at the bar
  tr FP: bara kendisi oturmak
4924 | familiar (adjective): easily recognized because you know it well | loc: tanıdık
  EN TS: She sees a familiar face.
  tr TS: Tanıdık bir yüz görüyor.
  EN FS: She sees a familiar dog.
  tr FS: Tanıdık bir köpek görüyor.
  EN TP: a familiar face
  tr TP: tanıdık bir yüz
  EN FP: a familiar song
  tr FP: tanıdık bir şarkı
4925 | care (verb): to look after someone who needs care | loc: bakmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is caring for a patient.
  tr TS: Bir hastaya bakıyor.
  EN FS: She is caring for a baby.
  tr FS: Bir bebeğe bakıyor.
  EN TP: caring for a hospital patient
  tr TP: hastanede bir hastaya bakmak
  EN FP: caring for a garden
  tr FP: bir bahçeye bakmak
4926 | dentist (noun): a person whose job is to fix and clean teeth | loc: diş hekimi
  EN TS: The dentist has a mirror.
  tr TS: Diş hekiminin elinde ayna var.
  EN FS: The dentist has a phone.
  tr FS: Diş hekiminin elinde telefon var.
  EN TP: a dentist with a mirror
  tr TP: aynalı bir diş hekimi
  EN FP: a dentist pulling a tooth
  tr FP: diş çeken bir diş hekimi
4927 | lawyer (noun): a person whose job is to practice law | loc: avukat
  EN TS: The lawyer is shaking hands.
  tr TS: Avukat tokalaşıyor.
  EN FS: The lawyer is holding hands.
  tr FS: Avukat el ele tutuşuyor.
  EN TP: a lawyer with a briefcase
  tr TP: evrak çantalı bir avukat
  EN FP: a lawyer with a laptop
  tr FP: dizüstü bilgisayarlı bir avukat
4928 | to fix (verb): to put something broken back together | loc: tamir etmek
  EN TS: He fixed the leak himself!
  tr TS: Sızıntıyı kendisi tamir etti!
  EN FS: He fixed the car himself!
  tr FS: Arabayı kendisi tamir etti!
  EN TP: fixing a leaking sink
  tr TP: akan bir lavaboyu tamir etmek
  EN FP: fixing a broken car
  tr FP: bozuk bir arabayı tamir etmek
4929 | grade (noun): the value your school work is given | loc: not
  EN TS: Guess who got a top grade!
  tr TS: Bil bakalım kim en yüksek notu aldı!
  EN FS: Guess who got a bad grade!
  tr FS: Bil bakalım kim kötü not aldı!
  EN TP: a top grade
  tr TP: en yüksek not
  EN FP: a bad grade
  tr FP: kötü bir not
4930 | reward (noun): something you get for doing worthy acts | loc: ödül
  EN TS: Her reward is a gold star!
  tr TS: Ödülü altın bir yıldız!
  EN FS: Her reward is a silver star!
  tr FS: Ödülü gümüş bir yıldız!
  EN TP: a gold star reward
  tr TP: altın yıldız ödülü
  EN FP: a reward for lost keys
  tr FP: kayıp anahtarlar için ödül
4931 | diagram (noun): a drawing that explains how something works | loc: diyagram
  EN TS: She is explaining a diagram.
  tr TS: Bir diyagramı anlatıyor.
  EN FS: She is explaining a poem.
  tr FS: Bir şiiri anlatıyor.
  EN TP: a chalk diagram
  tr TP: tebeşirle çizilmiş bir diyagram
  EN FP: a textbook diagram
  tr FP: ders kitabında bir diyagram
4932 | to steer (verb): to turn a wheel to control where a boat goes | loc: dümen tutmak | checker: word_missing? | translator note: dümen tutmak is boat-only; used direksiyon for the taxi
  EN TS: Cool cap! She is steering a taxi.
  tr TS: Havalı kasket! Taksinin direksiyonunu o çeviriyor.
  EN FS: Cool cap! She is steering a boat.
  tr FS: Havalı kasket! Teknenin dümenini o tutuyor.
  EN TP: steering a yellow taxi
  tr TP: sarı bir taksinin direksiyonunda
  EN FP: steering a yellow boat
  tr FP: sarı bir teknenin dümeninde
4933 | wheel (noun): a round frame that turns on an axle | loc: tekerlek | checker: word_missing? | translator note: tekerlek wrong for steering wheel; used direksiyon
  EN TS: One hand stays on the wheel.
  tr TS: Bir el hep direksiyonda.
  EN FS: One hand stays on the phone.
  tr FS: Bir el hep telefonda.
  EN TP: a bus steering wheel
  tr TP: otobüs direksiyonu
  EN FP: a bus spare wheel
  tr FP: otobüsün yedek tekerleği
4934 | headset (noun): a device worn on the head over eyes or ears | loc: başlık | checker: word_missing? | translator note: başlık wrong for a pilot headset; used kulaklık
  EN TS: She is putting on a headset.
  tr TS: Kulaklığını takıyor.
  EN FS: She is putting on a helmet.
  tr FS: Kaskını takıyor.
  EN TP: a green pilot headset
  tr TP: yeşil bir pilot kulaklığı
  EN FP: a VR headset for games
  tr FP: oyun için VR başlığı
4935 | compass (noun): an instrument whose needle shows you north | loc: pusula
  EN TS: She is touching the compass.
  tr TS: Pusulaya dokunuyor.
  EN FS: She is touching the radio.
  tr FS: Telsize dokunuyor.
  EN TP: a brass ship's compass
  tr TP: pirinç bir gemi pusulası
  EN FP: a compass for drawing circles
  tr FP: çizim için bir pergel
4936 | kitchen (noun): a room equipped for preparing meals | loc: mutfak
  EN TS: She is cooking in a kitchen.
  tr TS: Mutfakta yemek yapıyor.
  EN FS: She is cooking in a garden.
  tr FS: Bahçede yemek yapıyor.
  EN TP: a professional kitchen
  tr TP: profesyonel bir mutfak
  EN FP: a home kitchen
  tr FP: bir ev mutfağı
4937 | ring (verb): to sound loudly, like a bell | loc: çalmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is ringing the bell.
  tr TS: Zili çalıyor.
  EN FS: He is ringing the doorbell.
  tr FS: Kapı zilini çalıyor.
  EN TP: ringing the service bell
  tr TP: servis zilini çalmak
  EN FP: ringing a friend
  tr FP: bir arkadaşı telefonla aramak
4938 | waitress (noun): a woman who serves food to guests in a restaurant | loc: kadın garson
  EN TS: She's a busy waitress.
  tr TS: İşi başından aşkın bir kadın garson.
  EN FS: She's a busy nurse.
  tr FS: İşi başından aşkın bir hemşire.
  EN TP: a waitress on a terrace
  tr TP: terasta bir kadın garson
  EN FP: a waitress in a kitchen
  tr FP: mutfakta bir kadın garson
4939 | golden (adjective): shining with the bright yellow colour of gold | loc: altın rengi
  EN TS: Golden crust. Nice work, baker.
  tr TS: Altın rengi kabuk. Eline sağlık, fırıncı.
  EN FS: Burnt crust. Great work, baker.
  tr FS: Yanık kabuk. Eline sağlık, fırıncı.
  EN TP: golden brown croissants
  tr TP: altın rengi kruvasanlar
  EN FP: a golden wedding ring
  tr FP: altın rengi bir alyans
4940 | butcher (noun): a person who cuts and sells meat | loc: kasap
  EN TS: The butcher is wrapping meat.
  tr TS: Kasap eti paketliyor.
  EN FS: The butcher is wrapping gifts.
  tr FS: Kasap hediyeleri paketliyor.
  EN TP: a butcher wrapping steak
  tr TP: biftek saran bir kasap
  EN FP: a butcher cutting chicken
  tr FP: tavuk kesen bir kasap
4941 | firefighter (noun): a person whose job is putting out fires | loc: itfaiyeci | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The firefighter saved a cat!
  tr TS: İtfaiyeci bir kediyi kurtardı!
  EN FS: The firefighter saved a dog!
  tr FS: İtfaiyeci bir köpeği kurtardı!
  EN TP: a firefighter saving a cat
  tr TP: kedi kurtaran bir itfaiyeci
  EN FP: a firefighter fighting a fire
  tr FP: yangın söndüren bir itfaiyeci
4942 | luggage (noun): bags you carry your things in when traveling | loc: bagaj
  EN TS: One bag of luggage? Legend!
  tr TS: Tek parça bagaj mı? Efsane!
  EN FS: Five bags of luggage? Legend!
  tr FS: Beş parça bagaj mı? Efsane!
  EN TP: luggage over his shoulder
  tr TP: omzunda bagaj
  EN FP: luggage on a trolley
  tr FP: bavul arabasında bagaj
4943 | praise (noun): words or clapping that show approval | loc: övgü
  EN TS: He loves all this praise.
  tr TS: Bu kadar övgüye bayılıyor.
  EN FS: He hates all this praise.
  tr FS: Bu kadar övgüden nefret ediyor.
  EN TP: praise from the film crew
  tr TP: film ekibinden övgü
  EN FP: praise from his teacher
  tr FP: öğretmeninden övgü
4944 | gown (noun): a long formal dress worn to a ball | loc: balo elbisesi
  EN TS: Spotlight, roses and a gold gown!
  tr TS: Spot ışığı, güller ve altın bir balo elbisesi!
  EN FS: Spotlight, roses and a red gown!
  tr FS: Spot ışığı, güller ve kırmızı bir balo elbisesi!
  EN TP: a long pale-gold gown
  tr TP: açık altın rengi uzun balo elbisesi
  EN FP: trying on a wedding gown
  tr FP: gelinlik denemek
4945 | sing (verb): to make music with your voice by singing | loc: şarkı söylemek
  EN TS: She is singing into the mic.
  tr TS: Mikrofona şarkı söylüyor.
  EN FS: She is singing into a phone.
  tr FS: Telefona şarkı söylüyor.
  EN TP: singing into a microphone
  tr TP: mikrofona şarkı söylemek
  EN FP: singing in a choir
  tr FP: koroda şarkı söylemek
4946 | ponytail (noun): hair tied back so it hangs like a tail | loc: at kuyruğu
  EN TS: Her ponytail is dancing too.
  tr TS: At kuyruğu da dans ediyor.
  EN FS: Her scarf is dancing too.
  tr FS: Atkısı da dans ediyor.
  EN TP: a swinging ponytail
  tr TP: sallanan bir at kuyruğu
  EN FP: a ponytail under a cap
  tr FP: şapkanın altında at kuyruğu
4947 | portrait (noun): a picture that shows a person's face | loc: portre
  EN TS: Portrait done. Arms up!
  tr TS: Portre bitti. Eller havaya!
  EN FS: Landscape done. Arms up!
  tr FS: Manzara resmi bitti. Eller havaya!
  EN TP: a finished portrait
  tr TP: bitmiş bir portre
  EN FP: a portrait of a cat
  tr FP: bir kedi portresi
4948 | skyline (noun): the outline of a city against the sky | loc: şehir silueti
  EN TS: Make-up with a skyline view. Fancy.
  tr TS: Şehir silueti eşliğinde makyaj. Ne lüks.
  EN FS: Make-up with a beach view. Fancy.
  tr FS: Plaj manzarası eşliğinde makyaj. Ne lüks.
  EN TP: a city skyline behind her
  tr TP: arkasında şehir silueti
  EN FP: a skyline at sunset
  tr FP: gün batımında şehir silueti
4949 | scenery (noun): the beautiful natural landscape around you | loc: manzara
  EN TS: Snowy peaks: amazing scenery.
  tr TS: Karlı zirveler: muhteşem manzara.
  EN FS: Sandy dunes: amazing scenery.
  tr FS: Kum tepeleri: muhteşem manzara.
  EN TP: mountain scenery from the top
  tr TP: zirveden dağ manzarası
  EN FP: scenery from a train window
  tr FP: tren penceresinden manzara
4950 | hip (noun): the part where the leg joins the waist | loc: kalça
  EN TS: Hands on hips. Very serious.
  tr TS: Eller kalçada. Çok ciddi.
  EN FS: Hands on heads. Very serious.
  tr FS: Eller başta. Çok ciddi.
  EN TP: hands on the hips
  tr TP: eller kalçada
  EN FP: swinging the hips
  tr FP: kalça sallamak
4951 | home (adverb): to the place where your home is | loc: eve
  EN TS: He is home, and the dog is happy!
  tr TS: Eve geldi, köpek de havalara uçuyor!
  EN FS: He is home, and the cat is happy!
  tr FS: Eve geldi, kedi de havalara uçuyor!
  EN TP: coming home to the dog
  tr TP: eve, köpeğin yanına dönmek
  EN FP: leaving home for work
  tr FP: işe gitmek için evden çıkmak
4952 | bed (noun): the piece of furniture you sleep on | loc: yatak
  EN TS: He missed his bed so much.
  tr TS: Yatağını çok özlemiş.
  EN FS: He missed his car so much.
  tr FS: Arabasını çok özlemiş.
  EN TP: dropping onto the bed
  tr TP: kendini yatağa atmak
  EN FP: making the bed
  tr FP: yatağı toplamak
4953 | hope (verb): to wish for something and expect it to happen | loc: ummak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is hoping for photosynthesis.
  tr TS: Fotosentez olmasını umuyor.
  EN FS: She is hoping for a thunderstorm.
  tr FS: Gök gürültülü fırtına olmasını umuyor.
  EN TP: hoping for a sprout
  tr TP: filiz çıkmasını ummak
  EN FP: hoping for a rainbow
  tr FP: gökkuşağı çıkmasını ummak
4954 | visit (noun): going to see someone for a short time | loc: ziyaret
  EN TS: The visit makes her so happy!
  tr TS: Bu ziyaret onu çok mutlu ediyor!
  EN FS: The visit makes her so sad!
  tr FS: Bu ziyaret onu çok üzüyor!
  EN TP: a hospital visit
  tr TP: bir hastane ziyareti
  EN FP: a visit to the zoo
  tr FP: hayvanat bahçesi ziyareti
4955 | locker (noun): a storage box for your clothes and valuables | loc: dolap
  EN TS: Only the lockers look tidy here.
  tr TS: Burada sadece dolaplar düzenli görünüyor.
  EN FS: Only the bunk beds look tidy here.
  tr FS: Burada sadece ranzalar düzenli görünüyor.
  EN TP: a row of grey lockers
  tr TP: bir sıra gri dolap
  EN FP: a locker at a pool
  tr FP: havuzda bir dolap
4956 | reception (noun): the front desk where guests check in | loc: resepsiyon
  EN TS: She is walking to reception.
  tr TS: Resepsiyona yürüyor.
  EN FS: She is walking to the kitchen.
  tr FS: Mutfağa yürüyor.
  EN TP: the hostel reception desk
  tr TP: hostelin resepsiyon masası
  EN FP: a wedding reception
  tr FP: bir düğün resepsiyonu
4957 | hotel (noun): a building where travelers pay to stay | loc: otel
  EN TS: Hotel prices range from cheap to 2,000 EUR.
  tr TS: Otel fiyatları ucuzdan 2.000 euroya kadar.
  EN FS: Hotel prices range from cheap to 20 EUR.
  tr FS: Otel fiyatları ucuzdan 20 euroya kadar.
  EN TP: three kinds of hotel
  tr TP: üç tür otel
  EN FP: a hotel by the sea
  tr FP: deniz kenarında bir otel
4958 | villa (noun): a large, expensive house with a garden | loc: villa
  EN TS: From a hut to a glass villa!
  tr TS: Kulübeden cam villaya!
  EN FS: From a hut to a wooden villa!
  tr FS: Kulübeden ahşap villaya!
  EN TP: a huge glass villa
  tr TP: kocaman bir cam villa
  EN FP: a holiday villa for rent
  tr FP: kiralık bir tatil villası
4959 | cottage (noun): a small simple house in the countryside | loc: kulübe
  EN TS: A cottage with a sunflower.
  tr TS: Ayçiçekli bir kulübe.
  EN FS: A cottage with an apple tree.
  tr FS: Elma ağaçlı bir kulübe.
  EN TP: a small wooden cottage
  tr TP: küçük ahşap bir kulübe
  EN FP: a cottage by a lake
  tr FP: göl kenarında bir kulübe
4960 | cuddle (verb): to hold someone close in a soft, loving way | loc: sarılmak
  EN TS: They are cuddling at arrivals!
  tr TS: Varış salonunda sarılıyorlar!
  EN FS: They are fighting at arrivals!
  tr FS: Varış salonunda kavga ediyorlar!
  EN TP: a group cuddle at arrivals
  tr TP: varış salonunda toplu sarılma
  EN FP: cuddling a teddy bear
  tr FP: oyuncak ayıya sarılmak
4961 | pet (noun): an animal kept at home for company | loc: evcil hayvan
  EN TS: The pet is hunting a toy.
  tr TS: Evcil hayvan bir oyuncağın peşinde.
  EN FS: The pet is hunting a ball.
  tr FS: Evcil hayvan bir topun peşinde.
  EN TP: a pet cat hunting
  tr TP: avlanan evcil bir kedi
  EN FP: a pet cat sleeping
  tr FP: uyuyan evcil bir kedi
4962 | binoculars (noun): double lenses for seeing far-away things | loc: dürbün
  EN TS: He is using binoculars. Deer alert!
  tr TS: Dürbün kullanıyor. Geyik alarmı!
  EN FS: He is using a telescope. Deer alert!
  tr FS: Teleskop kullanıyor. Geyik alarmı!
  EN TP: looking through binoculars
  tr TP: dürbünle bakmak
  EN FP: binoculars at the opera
  tr FP: operada dürbün
4963 | finger (noun): any of the long parts on your hand, not the thumb | loc: parmak
  EN TS: She hurt her finger, then her toe!
  tr TS: Önce parmağını incitti, sonra ayak parmağını!
  EN FS: She hurt her finger, then her ear!
  tr FS: Önce parmağını incitti, sonra kulağını!
  EN TP: a hurt finger
  tr TP: incinmiş bir parmak
  EN FP: pointing a finger at him
  tr FP: onu parmakla göstermek
4964 | to taste (verb): to taste a little of something | loc: tatmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Soup to taste, then flowers. Smooth.
  tr TS: Önce çorba tadılır, sonra çiçekler gelir. Usta işi.
  EN FS: Soup to taste, then chocolate. Smooth.
  tr FS: Önce çorba tadılır, sonra çikolata gelir. Usta işi.
  EN TP: tasting soup from a spoon
  tr TP: kaşıktan çorba tatmak
  EN FP: tasting wine at a party
  tr FP: partide şarap tatmak
4965 | bathroom (noun): a room with a bath or shower and a washbasin | loc: banyo
  EN TS: The bathroom routine is done.
  tr TS: Banyo rutini tamam.
  EN FS: The kitchen routine is done.
  tr FS: Mutfak rutini tamam.
  EN TP: brushing teeth in the bathroom
  tr TP: banyoda diş fırçalamak
  EN FP: singing in the bathroom
  tr FP: banyoda şarkı söylemek
4966 | split (verb): to separate something into parts | loc: yarmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The ice split in two.
  tr TS: Buz ikiye yarıldı.
  EN FS: The ice split in three.
  tr FS: Buz üçe yarıldı.
  EN TP: splitting a slab of ice
  tr TP: bir buz kalıbını yarmak
  EN FP: splitting a log of wood
  tr FP: bir kütüğü yarmak
4967 | identity (noun): the characteristics by which a person is known | loc: kimlik
  EN TS: A scan checks her identity.
  tr TS: Bir tarayıcı kimliğini kontrol ediyor.
  EN FS: A scan checks her luggage.
  tr FS: Bir tarayıcı bagajını kontrol ediyor.
  EN TP: checking her identity
  tr TP: kimliğini kontrol etmek
  EN FP: hiding her identity
  tr FP: kimliğini gizlemek
4968 | card (noun): a card that shows your identity | loc: kart
  EN TS: She got her new ID card!
  tr TS: Yeni kimlik kartını aldı!
  EN FS: She got her new phone!
  tr FS: Yeni telefonunu aldı!
  EN TP: a new identity card
  tr TP: yeni bir kimlik kartı
  EN FP: a new birthday card
  tr FP: yeni bir doğum günü kartı
4969 | cafe (noun): a small restaurant selling drinks and snacks | loc: kafe
  EN TS: At the cafe, her book wins.
  tr TS: Kafede kazanan: kızın kitabı.
  EN FS: At the cafe, his phone wins.
  tr FS: Kafede kazanan: oğlanın telefonu.
  EN TP: reading at a cafe table
  tr TP: kafe masasında kitap okumak
  EN FP: working in a cafe kitchen
  tr FP: kafe mutfağında çalışmak
4970 | independence (noun): freedom from the control of others | loc: bağımsızlık
  EN TS: Fireworks for independence!
  tr TS: Bağımsızlık için havai fişekler!
  EN FS: Candles for independence!
  tr FS: Bağımsızlık için mumlar!
  EN TP: celebrating independence
  tr TP: bağımsızlığı kutlamak
  EN FP: fighting for independence
  tr FP: bağımsızlık için savaşmak
4971 | fireworks (noun): things that explode in the sky with colour | loc: havai fişek
  EN TS: Fireworks light up the dome.
  tr TS: Havai fişekler kubbeyi aydınlatıyor.
  EN FS: Fireworks light up the bridge.
  tr FS: Havai fişekler köprüyü aydınlatıyor.
  EN TP: fireworks over a dome
  tr TP: kubbenin üstünde havai fişekler
  EN FP: fireworks over a lake
  tr FP: gölün üstünde havai fişekler
4972 | patriotic (adjective): inspired by love for your country | loc: vatansever
  EN TS: What a patriotic night!
  tr TS: Ne vatansever bir gece!
  EN FS: What a patriotic morning!
  tr FS: Ne vatansever bir sabah!
  EN TP: a patriotic crowd
  tr TP: vatansever bir kalabalık
  EN FP: a patriotic army parade
  tr FP: vatansever bir askeri geçit töreni
4973 | monument (noun): a big old structure built to be remembered | loc: anıt
  EN TS: He is posing at a monument.
  tr TS: Bir anıtın önünde poz veriyor.
  EN FS: He is posing at a waterfall.
  tr FS: Bir şelalenin önünde poz veriyor.
  EN TP: posing at a white monument
  tr TP: beyaz bir anıtta poz vermek
  EN FP: a monument on a mountain
  tr FP: dağda bir anıt
4974 | seller (noun): someone who exchanges goods for money | loc: satıcı
  EN TS: The seller is pouring like a pro.
  tr TS: Satıcı çayı usta gibi dolduruyor.
  EN FS: The seller is juggling like a pro.
  tr FS: Satıcı usta gibi hokkabazlık yapıyor.
  EN TP: a tea seller pouring
  tr TP: çay dolduran bir satıcı
  EN FP: a seller of flowers
  tr FP: bir çiçek satıcısı
4975 | different (adjective): unlike something else in nature or quality | loc: farklı
  EN TS: Her style is so different!
  tr TS: Kızın tarzı çok farklı!
  EN FS: His style is so different!
  tr FS: Oğlanın tarzı çok farklı!
  EN TP: different from the crowd
  tr TP: kalabalıktan farklı
  EN FP: different from her sister
  tr FP: kız kardeşinden farklı
4976 | wade (verb): to walk through shallow water | loc: suda yürümek
  EN TS: He is wading through water.
  tr TS: Suda yürüyerek ilerliyor.
  EN FS: He is wading through snow.
  tr FS: Karda yürüyerek ilerliyor.
  EN TP: wading in rice fields
  tr TP: pirinç tarlalarında suda yürümek
  EN FP: wading in deep snow
  tr FP: derin karda yürümek
4977 | hand (noun): the end of the limb you grab things with | loc: el
  EN TS: A hand is leading the way.
  tr TS: Bir el yolu gösteriyor.
  EN FS: A dog is leading the way.
  tr FS: Bir köpek yolu gösteriyor.
  EN TP: an outstretched open hand
  tr TP: uzatılmış açık bir el
  EN FP: a hand full of rice
  tr FP: pirinç dolu bir el
4978 | cook (noun): someone who cooks food | loc: aşçı
  EN TS: The cook is playing with fire!
  tr TS: Aşçı ateşle oynuyor!
  EN FS: The cook is playing with ice!
  tr FS: Aşçı buzla oynuyor!
  EN TP: a cook at a wok
  tr TP: wok başında bir aşçı
  EN FP: a cook at a grill
  tr FP: ızgara başında bir aşçı
4979 | office (noun): a place of business where people do office work | loc: ofis
  EN TS: The whole office is sick!
  tr TS: Bütün ofis hasta!
  EN FS: The whole office is asleep!
  tr FS: Bütün ofis uyuyor!
  EN TP: coughing in the office
  tr TP: ofiste öksürmek
  EN FP: singing in the office
  tr FP: ofiste şarkı söylemek
4980 | to breathe (verb): to draw air into your lungs and let it out | loc: nefes almak
  EN TS: They are breathing in deeply.
  tr TS: Derin nefes alıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are shouting out loudly.
  tr FS: Yüksek sesle bağırıyorlar.
  EN TP: to breathe in fresh air
  tr TP: temiz havada nefes almak
  EN FP: to breathe under water
  tr FP: su altında nefes almak
4981 | vaccine (noun): an injection that protects you from a disease | loc: aşı
  EN TS: Everyone got the vaccine. Yay!
  tr TS: Herkes aşısını oldu. Yaşasın!
  EN FS: Nobody got the vaccine. Yay!
  tr FS: Kimse aşı olmadı. Yaşasın!
  EN TP: vaccines in upper arms
  tr TP: üst kollarda aşılar
  EN FP: a vaccine in the leg
  tr FP: bacakta bir aşı
4982 | ankle (noun): the joint between your leg and your foot | loc: ayak bileği
  EN TS: He is holding his ankle.
  tr TS: Ayak bileğini tutuyor.
  EN FS: He is holding his head.
  tr FS: Başını tutuyor.
  EN TP: a hurt ankle
  tr TP: incinmiş bir ayak bileği
  EN FP: a bracelet on the ankle
  tr FP: ayak bileğinde bir halhal
4983 | officer (noun): a person who holds a position of authority | loc: subay
  EN TS: The officer is checking everything, even under the van.
  tr TS: Subay her yeri kontrol ediyor, minibüsün altını bile!
  EN FS: The officer is checking everything, even under the bus.
  tr FS: Subay her yeri kontrol ediyor, otobüsün altını bile!
  EN TP: an officer checking a van
  tr TP: minibüsü kontrol eden bir subay
  EN FP: an officer on a ship
  tr FP: gemideki bir subay
4984 | briefcase (noun): a stiff flat case for carrying papers | loc: evrak çantası
  EN TS: Briefcase in hand, he's skating!
  tr TS: Elinde evrak çantasıyla kayıyor!
  EN FS: Coffee cup in hand, he's skating!
  tr FS: Elinde kahve bardağıyla kayıyor!
  EN TP: skating with a briefcase
  tr TP: evrak çantasıyla kaymak
  EN FP: a briefcase full of papers
  tr FP: kâğıt dolu bir evrak çantası
4985 | fix (verb): to attach something firmly in place | loc: sabitlemek
  EN TS: The screens are fixed in place.
  tr TS: Ekranlar yerine sabitlenmiş.
  EN FS: The mirrors are fixed in place.
  tr FS: Aynalar yerine sabitlenmiş.
  EN TP: fixing screens to the wall
  tr TP: ekranları duvara sabitlemek
  EN FP: fixing a meeting date
  tr FP: toplantı tarihini sabitlemek
4986 | bright (adjective): giving off a lot of light | loc: parlak
  EN TS: The wall is a bit bright.
  tr TS: Duvar biraz parlak.
  EN FS: The wall is a bit dark.
  tr FS: Duvar biraz karanlık.
  EN TP: bright blue screens
  tr TP: parlak mavi ekranlar
  EN FP: a bright sunny day
  tr FP: parlak güneşli bir gün
4987 | present (verb): to give an exhibition of work to an audience | loc: sunmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She presented. Coffee won.
  tr TS: Projesini sundu. Kazanan kahve oldu.
  EN FS: She presented. Pizza won.
  tr FS: Projesini sundu. Kazanan pizza oldu.
  EN TP: presenting her work
  tr TP: çalışmasını sunmak
  EN FP: presenting a TV show
  tr FP: bir TV programı sunmak
4988 | attack (noun): a military move against an enemy with weapons | loc: saldırı
  EN TS: The attack is starting!
  tr TS: Saldırı başlıyor!
  EN FS: The picnic is starting!
  tr FS: Piknik başlıyor!
  EN TP: a medieval attack
  tr TP: bir ortaçağ saldırısı
  EN FP: a heart attack
  tr FP: bir kalp krizi
4989 | hill (noun): a raised piece of land, smaller than a mountain | loc: tepe
  EN TS: They are storming down the hill!
  tr TS: Tepeden aşağı hücum ediyorlar!
  EN FS: They are storming down the road!
  tr FS: Yoldan aşağı hücum ediyorlar!
  EN TP: charging down a hill
  tr TP: tepeden aşağı hücum
  EN FP: rolling down a hill
  tr FP: tepeden aşağı yuvarlanmak
4990 | iron (noun): the hot tool for pressing clothes smooth | loc: ütü
  EN TS: He is using a heavy iron.
  tr TS: Ağır bir ütü kullanıyor.
  EN FS: He is using a heavy hammer.
  tr FS: Ağır bir çekiç kullanıyor.
  EN TP: a heavy steam iron
  tr TP: ağır bir buharlı ütü
  EN FP: an iron pan
  tr FP: demir bir tava
4991 | messy (adjective): dirty and not in any order | loc: dağınık
  EN TS: What a messy pile of clothes!
  tr TS: Ne dağınık bir kıyafet yığını!
  EN FS: What a messy pile of books!
  tr FS: Ne dağınık bir kitap yığını!
  EN TP: a messy pile of clothes
  tr TP: dağınık bir kıyafet yığını
  EN FP: a messy kitchen table
  tr FP: dağınık bir mutfak masası
4992 | busy (adjective): fully occupied with what you are doing | loc: meşgul
  EN TS: So much ironing! She is busy.
  tr TS: Bu kadar ütü! Çok meşgul.
  EN FS: So much cooking! She is busy.
  tr FS: Bu kadar yemek! Çok meşgul.
  EN TP: busy with the ironing
  tr TP: ütüyle meşgul
  EN FP: busy with the dishes
  tr FP: bulaşıkla meşgul
4993 | alone (adjective): kept apart from others, on your own | loc: yalnız
  EN TS: She is all alone on the lake.
  tr TS: Gölde yapayalnız.
  EN FS: She is all alone on the beach.
  tr FS: Sahilde yapayalnız.
  EN TP: alone on a tiny island
  tr TP: minik bir adada yalnız
  EN FP: alone in a big city
  tr FP: büyük bir şehirde yalnız
4994 | wooden (adjective): made of wood | loc: ahşap
  EN TS: She is using a wooden spoon.
  tr TS: Ahşap bir kaşık kullanıyor.
  EN FS: She is using a metal spoon.
  tr FS: Metal bir kaşık kullanıyor.
  EN TP: a long wooden spoon
  tr TP: uzun ahşap bir kaşık
  EN FP: a wooden chopping board
  tr FP: ahşap bir kesme tahtası
4995 | sculpture (noun): a three-dimensional work of art | loc: heykel
  EN TS: A fountain with a sculpture.
  tr TS: Heykelli bir çeşme.
  EN FS: A fountain with a clock.
  tr FS: Saatli bir çeşme.
  EN TP: a stone fountain sculpture
  tr TP: taş bir çeşme heykeli
  EN FP: a wedding ice sculpture
  tr FP: düğün için buz heykeli
4996 | cone (noun): any cone-shaped object you can hold | loc: külah
  EN TS: Pigeons love her ice cream cone.
  tr TS: Güvercinler dondurma külahına bayılıyor.
  EN FS: Seagulls love her ice cream cone.
  tr FS: Martılar dondurma külahına bayılıyor.
  EN TP: an ice cream cone
  tr TP: bir dondurma külahı
  EN FP: an orange traffic cone
  tr FP: turuncu bir trafik konisi
4997 | laugh (noun): the sound of laughing | loc: kahkaha
  EN TS: He has a loud laugh.
  tr TS: Kahkahası çok gür.
  EN FS: He has a quiet laugh.
  tr FS: Kahkahası çok sessiz.
  EN TP: a laugh at the Colosseum
  tr TP: Kolezyum'da bir kahkaha
  EN FP: a laugh in Paris
  tr FP: Paris'te bir kahkaha
4998 | tunnel (noun): a passage cut under the ground for traffic | loc: tünel
  EN TS: The tunnel is made of gates.
  tr TS: Tünel kapılardan oluşuyor.
  EN FS: The tunnel is made of trees.
  tr FS: Tünel ağaçlardan oluşuyor.
  EN TP: a tunnel of shrine gates
  tr TP: tapınak kapılarından bir tünel
  EN FP: a tunnel under the sea
  tr FP: denizin altında bir tünel
4999 | combat (verb): to battle against someone in a fight | loc: dövüşmek
  EN TS: He's combating a swordsman.
  tr TS: Bir kılıç ustasıyla dövüşüyor.
  EN FS: He's combating an archer.
  tr FS: Bir okçuyla dövüşüyor.
  EN TP: combating a swordsman
  tr TP: bir kılıç ustasıyla dövüşmek
  EN FP: combating a bad cold
  tr FP: inatçı bir soğuk algınlığıyla dövüşmek
5000 | thin (adjective): not thick from one surface to the other | loc: ince | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: His thin slices look perfect.
  tr TS: İnce dilimleri kusursuz görünüyor.
  EN FS: His thick slices look perfect.
  tr FS: Kalın dilimleri kusursuz görünüyor.
  EN TP: thin slices of fish
  tr TP: ince balık dilimleri
  EN FP: thin slices of bread
  tr FP: ince ekmek dilimleri
5001 | landscape (noun): a wide view of natural scenery | loc: manzara
  EN TS: Worth it for this landscape.
  tr TS: Bu manzaraya değdi.
  EN FS: Worth it for this beach.
  tr FS: Bu plaja değdi.
  EN TP: a mountain landscape
  tr TP: bir dağ manzarası
  EN FP: a landscape painting
  tr FP: bir manzara tablosu
5002 | dusk (noun): the fading light just before night | loc: alacakaranlık
  EN TS: They are jumping in at dusk.
  tr TS: Alacakaranlıkta suya atlıyorlar.
  EN FS: They are jumping in at noon.
  tr FS: Öğlen suya atlıyorlar.
  EN TP: a forest lake at dusk
  tr TP: alacakaranlıkta bir orman gölü
  EN FP: dusk in a big city
  tr FP: büyük bir şehirde alacakaranlık
5003 | explorer (noun): someone who travels into little known places | loc: kâşif
  EN TS: An explorer is cutting a path.
  tr TS: Bir kâşif kendine yol açıyor.
  EN FS: An explorer is cutting a tree.
  tr FS: Bir kâşif ağaç kesiyor.
  EN TP: an explorer with a machete
  tr TP: palalı bir kâşif
  EN FP: an explorer with a map
  tr FP: haritalı bir kâşif
5004 | spring (verb): to move forward in big leaps | loc: sıçramak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The kangaroo is springing forward.
  tr TS: Kanguru ileri sıçrıyor.
  EN FS: The kangaroo is springing backward.
  tr FS: Kanguru geri sıçrıyor.
  EN TP: to spring across the sand
  tr TP: kumun üstünde sıçramak
  EN FP: to spring out of bed
  tr FP: yataktan sıçramak
5005 | bay (noun): a part of the sea curving into the land | loc: koy
  EN TS: She sees everything in this bay.
  tr TS: Bu koyda her şeyi görüyor.
  EN FS: She sees everything in this park.
  tr FS: Bu parkta her şeyi görüyor.
  EN TP: boats in a quiet bay
  tr TP: sakin bir koyda tekneler
  EN FP: a bay full of ice
  tr FP: buzla dolu bir koy
5006 | kettle (noun): the pot you boil water in for tea or coffee | loc: su ısıtıcısı
  EN TS: Her kettle is working hard.
  tr TS: Su ısıtıcısı var gücüyle çalışıyor.
  EN FS: Her toaster is working hard.
  tr FS: Ekmek kızartma makinesi var gücüyle çalışıyor.
  EN TP: boiling water in a kettle
  tr TP: su ısıtıcısında su kaynatmak
  EN FP: a kettle on a fire
  tr FP: ateşin üstünde bir su ısıtıcısı
5007 | lock (noun): a fastener on a door that keeps it closed | loc: kilit
  EN TS: Yes! Her key is in the lock!
  tr TS: Evet! Anahtarı kilitte!
  EN FS: Yes! Her key is in the car!
  tr FS: Evet! Anahtarı arabada!
  EN TP: a key in the lock
  tr TP: kilitte bir anahtar
  EN FP: a lock on a bike
  tr FP: bisiklette bir kilit
5008 | unlock (verb): to open the lock of something with a key | loc: kilidini açmak
  EN TS: She unlocked the wooden door.
  tr TS: Ahşap kapının kilidini açtı.
  EN FS: She unlocked the garage door.
  tr FS: Garaj kapısının kilidini açtı.
  EN TP: to unlock the wooden door
  tr TP: ahşap kapının kilidini açmak
  EN FP: to unlock a phone
  tr FP: bir telefonun kilidini açmak
5009 | child (noun): a young person, a boy or a girl | loc: çocuk
  EN TS: The child is sliding down.
  tr TS: Çocuk kaydıraktan kayıyor.
  EN FS: The child is climbing up.
  tr FS: Çocuk yukarı tırmanıyor.
  EN TP: a child on a slide
  tr TP: kaydırakta bir çocuk
  EN FP: a child on a swing
  tr FP: salıncakta bir çocuk
5010 | king (noun): a man who rules a kingdom | loc: kral
  EN TS: Long live the king!
  tr TS: Yaşasın kral!
  EN FS: Long live the queen!
  tr FS: Yaşasın kraliçe!
  EN TP: a king on a balcony
  tr TP: balkonda bir kral
  EN FP: a king on a horse
  tr FP: at üstünde bir kral
5011 | old (adjective): having lived for a long time | loc: yaşlı
  EN TS: The old couple is kissing, how cute!
  tr TS: Yaşlı çift öpüşüyor, çok tatlı!
  EN FS: The old couple is dancing, how cute!
  tr FS: Yaşlı çift dans ediyor, çok tatlı!
  EN TP: an old couple kissing
  tr TP: öpüşen yaşlı bir çift
  EN FP: an old couple dancing
  tr FP: dans eden yaşlı bir çift
5012 | romance (noun): a loving relationship between two people | loc: aşk ilişkisi | translator note: aşk ilişkisi unnatural here; used aşk
  EN TS: Paris is full of romance!
  tr TS: Paris aşk dolu!
  EN FS: Paris is full of snow!
  tr FS: Paris kar dolu!
  EN TP: romance in Paris
  tr TP: Paris'te aşk
  EN FP: a romance novel
  tr FP: bir aşk romanı
5013 | cheap (adjective): low in price, not costing much | loc: ucuz
  EN TS: The cheap kitchen is old.
  tr TS: Ucuz mutfak eski.
  EN FS: The cheap kitchen is huge.
  tr FS: Ucuz mutfak kocaman.
  EN TP: a cheap old kitchen
  tr TP: ucuz, eski bir mutfak
  EN FP: a cheap fast car
  tr FP: ucuz, hızlı bir araba
5014 | rich (adjective): having a lot of money and material wealth | loc: zengin
  EN TS: The rich cook has the best view.
  tr TS: Zengin aşçının manzarası en iyisi.
  EN FS: The rich cook has the best dog.
  tr FS: Zengin aşçının köpeği en iyisi.
  EN TP: a rich man's kitchen
  tr TP: zengin bir adamın mutfağı
  EN FP: a rich man's car
  tr FP: zengin bir adamın arabası
5015 | homemade (adjective): made at home by yourself, not bought | loc: ev yapımı
  EN TS: Homemade bread, made by hand.
  tr TS: Ev yapımı ekmek, elde yoğrulmuş.
  EN FS: Homemade pasta, made by hand.
  tr FS: Ev yapımı makarna, elde yoğrulmuş.
  EN TP: a homemade loaf of bread
  tr TP: ev yapımı bir somun ekmek
  EN FP: homemade jam in jars
  tr FP: kavanozda ev yapımı reçel
5016 | knee (noun): the joint in the middle of your leg | loc: diz
  EN TS: He is bending his knees.
  tr TS: Dizlerini büküyor.
  EN FS: He is bending his arms.
  tr FS: Kollarını büküyor.
  EN TP: bare knees in a squat
  tr TP: çömelirken çıplak dizler
  EN FP: down on one knee
  tr FP: tek diz üstünde
5017 | cut (adjective): separated into pieces with a sharp knife | loc: doğranmış
  EN TS: A rainbow of cut vegetables!
  tr TS: Doğranmış sebzelerden bir gökkuşağı!
  EN FS: A rainbow of cut fruit!
  tr FS: Doğranmış meyvelerden bir gökkuşağı!
  EN TP: cut vegetables in rows
  tr TP: sıra sıra doğranmış sebzeler
  EN FP: cut flowers in a vase
  tr FP: vazoda kesilmiş çiçekler
5018 | tasty (adjective): pleasing to the sense of taste | loc: lezzetli
  EN TS: That meal looks so tasty!
  tr TS: O yemek çok lezzetli görünüyor!
  EN FS: That soup looks so tasty!
  tr FS: O çorba çok lezzetli görünüyor!
  EN TP: a tasty bowl of rice
  tr TP: lezzetli bir kase pilav
  EN FP: a tasty slice of cake
  tr FP: lezzetli bir dilim pasta
5019 | beef (noun): meat from an adult cow | loc: sığır eti
  EN TS: She is grilling beef.
  tr TS: Sığır eti ızgara yapıyor.
  EN FS: She is grilling fish.
  tr FS: Balık ızgara yapıyor.
  EN TP: slices of grilled beef
  tr TP: ızgara sığır eti dilimleri
  EN FP: a beef burger with fries
  tr FP: patates kızartmalı dana burger
5020 | replace (verb): to put a new thing in place of a broken one | loc: değiştirmek
  EN TS: Two people to replace one bulb!
  tr TS: Bir ampulü değiştirmek için iki kişi!
  EN FS: Five people to replace one bulb!
  tr FS: Bir ampulü değiştirmek için beş kişi!
  EN TP: replacing a dead bulb
  tr TP: yanmış bir ampulü değiştirmek
  EN FP: replacing a flat tyre
  tr FP: patlak bir lastiği değiştirmek
5021 | lady (noun): a polite name for any woman | loc: hanımefendi
  EN TS: Such an elegant lady pouring tea.
  tr TS: Çay dolduran ne zarif bir hanımefendi.
  EN FS: Such an elegant lady pouring wine.
  tr FS: Şarap dolduran ne zarif bir hanımefendi.
  EN TP: a lady in a bonnet
  tr TP: boneli bir hanımefendi
  EN FP: a lady on a horse
  tr FP: at üstünde bir hanımefendi
5022 | shine (verb): to be bright by casting or reflecting light | loc: parlamak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: The chandelier is shining!
  tr TS: Avize parlıyor!
  EN FS: The mirror is shining!
  tr FS: Ayna parlıyor!
  EN TP: a shining chandelier
  tr TP: parlayan bir avize
  EN FP: shining shoes
  tr FP: parlayan ayakkabılar
5023 | airplane (noun): an aircraft with fixed wings, powered by jets | loc: uçak
  EN TS: He is cheering at an airplane!
  tr TS: Bir uçağa tezahürat yapıyor!
  EN FS: He is cheering at a train!
  tr FS: Bir trene tezahürat yapıyor!
  EN TP: an airplane landing low
  tr TP: alçaktan inen bir uçak
  EN FP: an airplane taking off
  tr FP: havalanan bir uçak
5024 | dictionary (noun): a book that lists words and what they mean | loc: sözlük
  EN TS: She has all the dictionaries!
  tr TS: Bütün sözlükler onda!
  EN FS: She has all the cookbooks!
  tr FS: Bütün yemek kitapları onda!
  EN TP: a stack of dictionaries
  tr TP: bir yığın sözlük
  EN FP: a dictionary app
  tr FP: bir sözlük uygulaması
5025 | joke (noun): a funny remark that causes laughter | loc: şaka
  EN TS: OMG, this joke is too funny!
  tr TS: Aman tanrım, bu şaka çok komik!
  EN FS: OMG, this lesson is too funny!
  tr FS: Aman tanrım, bu ders çok komik!
  EN TP: a joke on a phone
  tr TP: telefonda bir şaka
  EN FP: a joke from the teacher
  tr FP: öğretmenden bir şaka
5026 | hilarious (adjective): very funny, causing wild laughter | loc: çok komik
  EN TS: His phone is hilarious today.
  tr TS: Telefonu bugün çok komik.
  EN FS: His book is hilarious today.
  tr FS: Kitabı bugün çok komik.
  EN TP: hilarious in a lecture
  tr TP: derste çok komik
  EN FP: hilarious at a wedding
  tr FP: düğünde çok komik
5027 | judge (noun): an official who settles questions in court | loc: hâkim
  EN TS: The judge is using her gavel.
  tr TS: Hâkim tokmağını kullanıyor.
  EN FS: The judge is using her phone.
  tr FS: Hâkim telefonunu kullanıyor.
  EN TP: a judge with a gavel
  tr TP: tokmaklı bir hâkim
  EN FP: a judge in a wig
  tr FP: peruklu bir hâkim
5028 | difficult (adjective): not easy, needing a lot of effort to do | loc: zor
  EN TS: Difficult case? Just a few books.
  tr TS: Zor dava mı? Sadece birkaç kitap.
  EN FS: Difficult case? Just a few pens.
  tr FS: Zor dava mı? Sadece birkaç kalem.
  EN TP: a difficult court case
  tr TP: zor bir mahkeme davası
  EN FP: a difficult exam
  tr FP: zor bir sınav
5029 | gesture (noun): a motion of the hands or body to show a feeling | loc: jest
  EN TS: His gesture says: I won!
  tr TS: Oğlanın jesti diyor ki: Kazandım!
  EN FS: Her gesture says: I won!
  tr FS: Kızın jesti diyor ki: Kazandım!
  EN TP: a winning fist gesture
  tr TP: zafer yumruğu jesti
  EN FP: a rude hand gesture
  tr FP: kaba bir el jesti
5030 | costume (noun): special clothes worn for a show or festival | loc: kostüm
  EN TS: Her costume has every colour!
  tr TS: Kostümünde her renk var!
  EN FS: Her hat has every colour!
  tr FS: Şapkasında her renk var!
  EN TP: a rainbow feather costume
  tr TP: gökkuşağı renkli tüylü kostüm
  EN FP: a costume for Halloween
  tr FP: Cadılar Bayramı kostümü
5031 | leader (noun): a person who guides others | loc: lider
  EN TS: The leader is pointing ahead.
  tr TS: Lider ileriyi gösteriyor.
  EN FS: The leader is sitting down.
  tr FS: Lider oturuyor.
  EN TP: a leader on a mountain
  tr TP: dağda bir lider
  EN FP: a leader on a beach
  tr FP: sahilde bir lider
5032 | ahead (adverb): in front of the others | loc: önde
  EN TS: She is leading the team ahead.
  tr TS: Önde yürüyüp takımı ileri götürüyor.
  EN FS: She is leading the team back.
  tr FS: Önde yürüyüp takımı geri götürüyor.
  EN TP: walking ahead of the group
  tr TP: grubun önünde yürümek
  EN FP: planning ahead for the trip
  tr FP: gezi için önceden plan yapmak
5033 | drum (noun): a musical instrument you hit to make a beat | loc: davul
  EN TS: The neighbours can hear these drums.
  tr TS: Komşular bu davulları duyuyordur.
  EN FS: The neighbours can hear these horns.
  tr FS: Komşular bu boruları duyuyordur.
  EN TP: beating the drums
  tr TP: davul çalmak
  EN FP: a drum solo
  tr FP: bir davul solosu
5034 | spill (verb): to let liquid fall out of a container | loc: dökmek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Everything spills in her home!
  tr TS: Onun evinde her şey dökülüyor!
  EN FS: Everything burns in her home!
  tr FS: Onun evinde her şey yanıyor!
  EN TP: milk spilling on the table
  tr TP: masaya dökülen süt
  EN FP: spilling coffee on a laptop
  tr FP: dizüstüne kahve dökmek
5035 | talent (noun): natural abilities or qualities you have | loc: yetenek
  EN TS: That juggler has talent!
  tr TS: Bu hokkabazın yeteneği var ya!
  EN FS: That singer has talent!
  tr FS: Bu şarkıcının yeteneği var ya!
  EN TP: a talent for juggling
  tr TP: hokkabazlık yeteneği
  EN FP: a talent show
  tr FP: bir yetenek yarışması
5036 | learn (verb): to get new knowledge or skills | loc: öğrenmek
  EN TS: She teaches, he learns. Slowly.
  tr TS: Kız öğretiyor, oğlan öğreniyor. Yavaş yavaş.
  EN FS: He teaches, she learns. Slowly.
  tr FS: Oğlan öğretiyor, kız öğreniyor. Yavaş yavaş.
  EN TP: learning to juggle
  tr TP: hokkabazlık öğrenmek
  EN FP: learning to dance
  tr FP: dans öğrenmek
5037 | sidewalk (noun): the paved path beside a road where people walk | loc: kaldırım
  EN TS: She is on a Paris sidewalk.
  tr TS: Bir Paris kaldırımında.
  EN FS: She is on a Paris bridge.
  tr FS: Bir Paris köprüsünde.
  EN TP: a wide paved sidewalk
  tr TP: geniş, döşeli bir kaldırım
  EN FP: a sidewalk cafe table
  tr FP: kaldırımda bir kafe masası
5038 | pace (noun): how fast you are walking or running | loc: tempo
  EN TS: A steady pace up the Great Wall.
  tr TS: Çin Seddi'nde yukarı doğru sabit tempo.
  EN FS: A steady pace down the Great Wall.
  tr FS: Çin Seddi'nde aşağı doğru sabit tempo.
  EN TP: a steady running pace
  tr TP: sabit bir koşu temposu
  EN FP: a slow walking pace
  tr FP: yavaş bir yürüyüş temposu
5039 | cage (noun): a box of metal bars that shuts an animal in | loc: kafes
  EN TS: He is opening the cages.
  tr TS: Kafesleri açıyor.
  EN FS: He is closing the cages.
  tr FS: Kafesleri kapatıyor.
  EN TP: opening the bird cages
  tr TP: kuş kafeslerini açmak
  EN FP: cleaning the bird cages
  tr FP: kuş kafeslerini temizlemek
5040 | armchair (noun): a big soft chair with supports for your arms | loc: koltuk
  EN TS: An armchair? On a bike? Sure.
  tr TS: Koltuk mu? Bisikletle mi? Tabii canım.
  EN FS: A sofa? On a bike? Sure.
  tr FS: Kanepe mi? Bisikletle mi? Tabii canım.
  EN TP: a yellow velvet armchair
  tr TP: sarı kadife bir koltuk
  EN FP: an armchair in a car
  tr FP: arabada bir koltuk
5041 | flash (noun): a sudden burst of bright light | loc: parlama
  EN TS: A white flash lights the roof.
  tr TS: Beyaz bir parlama çatıyı aydınlatıyor.
  EN FS: A green flash lights the roof.
  tr FS: Yeşil bir parlama çatıyı aydınlatıyor.
  EN TP: a blinding white flash
  tr TP: kör edici beyaz bir parlama
  EN FP: a camera flash indoors
  tr FP: kapalı alanda flaş parlaması
5042 | painful (adjective): causing pain in your body or mind | loc: acı verici
  EN TS: Leg day was painful!
  tr TS: Bacak günü acı vericiydi!
  EN FS: Arm day was painful!
  tr FS: Kol günü acı vericiydi!
  EN TP: painful stiff legs
  tr TP: bacaklarda acı verici tutulma
  EN FP: a painful sunburn
  tr FP: acı verici bir güneş yanığı
5043 | silent (adjective): with no sound at all | loc: sessiz
  EN TS: The lion is not silent.
  tr TS: Aslan hiç sessiz değil.
  EN FS: The lion is not alone.
  tr FS: Aslan hiç yalnız değil.
  EN TP: not a silent lion
  tr TP: hiç sessiz olmayan bir aslan
  EN FP: a silent lion
  tr FP: sessiz bir aslan
5044 | hear (verb): to notice a sound with your ears | loc: duymak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He can hear through the door.
  tr TS: Kapının arkasından duyabiliyor.
  EN FS: He can hear through the wall.
  tr FS: Duvarın arkasından duyabiliyor.
  EN TP: hearing through a door
  tr TP: kapının ardından duymak
  EN FP: hearing a doorbell ring
  tr FP: kapı zilinin çaldığını duymak
5045 | sound (noun): the effect you hear from something | loc: ses
  EN TS: The speakers make a big sound!
  tr TS: Hoparlörler kocaman ses çıkarıyor!
  EN FS: The drums make a big sound!
  tr FS: Davullar kocaman ses çıkarıyor!
  EN TP: sound from a boombox
  tr TP: bir teypten gelen ses
  EN FP: sound from a car radio
  tr FP: araba radyosundan gelen ses
5046 | television (noun): broadcasting moving pictures to a screen | loc: televizyon
  EN TS: The television made him jump!
  tr TS: Televizyon onu yerinden zıplattı!
  EN FS: The television made him cry!
  tr FS: Televizyon onu ağlattı!
  EN TP: watching television
  tr TP: televizyon izlemek
  EN FP: fixing the television
  tr FP: televizyonu tamir etmek
5047 | living room (noun): the room in a home where people sit and relax | loc: oturma odası
  EN TS: Nobody is leaving the living room tonight.
  tr TS: Bu gece kimse oturma odasından çıkmıyor.
  EN FS: Nobody is leaving the kitchen tonight.
  tr FS: Bu gece kimse mutfaktan çıkmıyor.
  EN TP: a cosy living room
  tr TP: sıcacık bir oturma odası
  EN FP: cleaning the living room
  tr FP: oturma odasını temizlemek
5048 | shut (adjective): closed, not open | loc: kapalı
  EN TS: Big padlock, doors still shut.
  tr TS: Kocaman asma kilit, kapılar hâlâ kapalı.
  EN FS: Big padlock, doors wide open.
  tr FS: Kocaman asma kilit, kapılar ardına kadar açık.
  EN TP: doors firmly shut
  tr TP: sımsıkı kapalı kapılar
  EN FP: eyes shut tight
  tr FP: sımsıkı kapalı gözler
5049 | close (verb): to move something so an opening is blocked | loc: kapatmak
  EN TS: He is closing the front door.
  tr TS: Sokak kapısını kapatıyor.
  EN FS: He is closing the garage door.
  tr FS: Garaj kapısını kapatıyor.
  EN TP: closing a front door
  tr TP: sokak kapısını kapatmak
  EN FP: closing a shop
  tr FP: bir dükkânı kapatmak
5050 | lose (verb): to fail to win | loc: kaybetmek
  EN TS: He lost, and the guests left.
  tr TS: Kaybetti ve misafirler gitti.
  EN FS: He won, and the guests left.
  tr FS: Kazandı ve misafirler gitti.
  EN TP: losing an election
  tr TP: seçimi kaybetmek
  EN FP: losing his car keys
  tr FP: araba anahtarlarını kaybetmek
5051 | lose (verb): to put something where you cannot find it | loc: kaybetmek
  EN TS: She lost it. Passport, maybe?
  tr TS: Onu kaybetti. Pasaport mu acaba?
  EN FS: She found it. Passport, maybe?
  tr FS: Onu buldu. Pasaport mu acaba?
  EN TP: losing something important
  tr TP: önemli bir şeyi kaybetmek
  EN FP: losing a football match
  tr FP: bir futbol maçını kaybetmek
5052 | light (adjective): having little physical weight, not heavy | loc: hafif
  EN TS: The bags are not light.
  tr TS: Çantalar hiç hafif değil.
  EN FS: The chairs are not light.
  tr FS: Sandalyeler hiç hafif değil.
  EN TP: suitcases that are not light
  tr TP: hiç hafif olmayan bavullar
  EN FP: light hand luggage
  tr FP: hafif bir kabin bagajı
5053 | label (noun): a short description that identifies something | loc: etiket
  EN TS: The label displays her photo.
  tr TS: Etikette onun fotoğrafı var.
  EN FS: The label displays her dog.
  tr FS: Etikette onun köpeği var.
  EN TP: a label with her photo
  tr TP: fotoğraflı bir etiket
  EN FP: a label on a jar
  tr FP: kavanozda bir etiket
5054 | lift (verb): to take hold of something and move it | loc: kaldırmak
  EN TS: Bro is lifting half the house.
  tr TS: Kanka evin yarısını kaldırıyor.
  EN FS: Bro is lifting half the tent.
  tr FS: Kanka çadırın yarısını kaldırıyor.
  EN TP: lifting cases into a van
  tr TP: kolileri minibüse kaldırmak
  EN FP: lifting weights in a gym
  tr FP: spor salonunda ağırlık kaldırmak
5055 | organ (noun): a body part in an animal with its own function | loc: organ
  EN TS: Two pink organs: the lungs.
  tr TS: İki pembe organ: akciğerler.
  EN FS: Two pink organs: the kidneys.
  tr FS: İki pembe organ: böbrekler.
  EN TP: a pair of breathing organs
  tr TP: bir çift solunum organı
  EN FP: a church organ playing
  tr FP: çalan bir kilise orgu
5056 | maid (noun): a woman whose job is cleaning hotel rooms | loc: oda görevlisi
  EN TS: The maid made a towel swan.
  tr TS: Oda görevlisi havludan kuğu yaptı.
  EN FS: The maid made a towel dog.
  tr FS: Oda görevlisi havludan köpek yaptı.
  EN TP: a maid folding towels
  tr TP: havlu katlayan oda görevlisi
  EN FP: a maid in a castle
  tr FP: şatoda bir oda görevlisi
5057 | mail (noun): letters and packages sent by post | loc: posta
  EN TS: Her mail is flying everywhere!
  tr TS: Postası her yere uçuşuyor!
  EN FS: Her cash is flying everywhere!
  tr FS: Parası her yere uçuşuyor!
  EN TP: mail from the mailbox
  tr TP: posta kutusundan çıkan postalar
  EN FP: mail on a computer
  tr FP: bilgisayarda e-posta
5058 | postman (noun): a person whose job is to bring letters to houses | loc: postacı
  EN TS: The boy loves the postman now.
  tr TS: Çocuk artık postacıya bayılıyor.
  EN FS: The boy loves the teacher now.
  tr FS: Çocuk artık öğretmene bayılıyor.
  EN TP: a postman with letters
  tr TP: mektup getiren bir postacı
  EN FP: a postman with a dog
  tr FP: köpekli bir postacı
5059 | letter (noun): a written message you send to a person | loc: mektup
  EN TS: He got a lot of letters!
  tr TS: Bir sürü mektup almış!
  EN FS: He got a lot of flowers!
  tr FS: Bir sürü çiçek almış!
  EN TP: a stack of letters
  tr TP: bir deste mektup
  EN FP: a letter from school
  tr FP: okuldan bir mektup
5060 | male (noun): a person of the sex that cannot have babies | loc: erkek
  EN TS: Only males are in this video.
  tr TS: Bu videoda sadece erkekler var.
  EN FS: Only girls are in this video.
  tr FS: Bu videoda sadece kızlar var.
  EN TP: males of every age
  tr TP: her yaştan erkekler
  EN FP: males in a football team
  tr FP: futbol takımındaki erkekler
5061 | aquarium (noun): a glass tank of water where fish are kept | loc: akvaryum
  EN TS: Oh wow, what an aquarium!
  tr TS: Vay canına, ne akvaryum ama!
  EN FS: Oh wow, what a volcano!
  tr FS: Vay canına, ne yanardağ ama!
  EN TP: a huge aquarium
  tr TP: kocaman bir akvaryum
  EN FP: a huge swimming pool
  tr FP: kocaman bir yüzme havuzu
5062 | boss (noun): a person who is in control of workers | loc: patron
  EN TS: The boss is drawing a graph.
  tr TS: Patron grafik çiziyor.
  EN FS: The boss is drawing a cat.
  tr FS: Patron kedi çiziyor.
  EN TP: a boss giving instructions
  tr TP: talimat veren bir patron
  EN FP: a boss taking a break
  tr FP: mola veren bir patron
5063 | column (noun): a line of people following one after another | loc: kortej
  EN TS: The column is moving in order.
  tr TS: Kortej düzen içinde ilerliyor.
  EN FS: The crowd is moving in order.
  tr FS: Kalabalık düzen içinde ilerliyor.
  EN TP: a column of marching ranks
  tr TP: tören adımıyla yürüyen bir kortej
  EN FP: a column in a newspaper
  tr FP: gazetede bir köşe yazısı
5064 | trumpet (noun): a brass instrument you blow into | loc: trompet
  EN TS: A hundred trumpets. My poor ears!
  tr TS: Yüz trompet. Zavallı kulaklarım!
  EN FS: A hundred violins. My poor ears!
  tr FS: Yüz keman. Zavallı kulaklarım!
  EN TP: marching with trumpets
  tr TP: trompetlerle yürümek
  EN FP: a jazz club trumpet
  tr FP: caz kulübünde bir trompet
5065 | aisle (noun): a narrow walkway between rows of shelves | loc: koridor
  EN TS: A long aisle of spices.
  tr TS: Uzun bir baharat koridoru.
  EN FS: A long aisle of shoes.
  tr FS: Uzun bir ayakkabı koridoru.
  EN TP: an aisle of spice stalls
  tr TP: baharat tezgâhları arasında koridor
  EN FP: the aisle of a plane
  tr FP: uçağın koridoru
5066 | sample (noun): a small part that shows what the whole is like | loc: numune
  EN TS: Just one olive, as a sample.
  tr TS: Numune olarak sadece bir zeytin.
  EN FS: Just one date, as a sample.
  tr FS: Numune olarak sadece bir hurma.
  EN TP: an olive as a sample
  tr TP: numune olarak bir zeytin
  EN FP: a sample of spices
  tr FP: bir baharat numunesi
5067 | marriage (noun): the state of being a married couple | loc: evlilik
  EN TS: Marriage starts with a kiss!
  tr TS: Evlilik bir öpücükle başlar!
  EN FS: Marriage starts with a fight!
  tr FS: Evlilik bir kavgayla başlar!
  EN TP: a marriage with confetti
  tr TP: konfetili bir evlilik
  EN FP: a marriage in a church
  tr FP: kilisede bir evlilik
5068 | bride (noun): the woman getting married that day | loc: gelin
  EN TS: The bride is giving a ring.
  tr TS: Gelin yüzüğü veriyor.
  EN FS: The bride is giving a speech.
  tr FS: Gelin konuşma yapıyor.
  EN TP: a bride on the beach
  tr TP: sahilde bir gelin
  EN FP: a bride in a church
  tr FP: kilisede bir gelin
5069 | enjoy (verb): to get pleasure from something | loc: keyif almak
  EN TS: Oh wow! He is enjoying the massage.
  tr TS: Vay be! Masajdan keyif alıyor.
  EN FS: Oh wow! He is enjoying the coffee.
  tr FS: Vay be! Kahveden keyif alıyor.
  EN TP: to enjoy a neck massage
  tr TP: boyun masajından keyif almak
  EN FP: to enjoy a foot massage
  tr FP: ayak masajından keyif almak
5070 | mattress (noun): the thick soft part of a bed you lie on | loc: yatak
  EN TS: She's testing every mattress.
  tr TS: Her yatağı tek tek deniyor.
  EN FS: She's testing every pillow.
  tr FS: Her yastığı tek tek deniyor.
  EN TP: lying back on a mattress
  tr TP: yatağa sırtüstü uzanmak
  EN FP: carrying a mattress
  tr FP: yatak taşımak
5071 | service (verb): to make a machine fit to use again | loc: bakımını yapmak
  EN TS: He is servicing the vehicle.
  tr TS: Aracın bakımını yapıyor.
  EN FS: He is servicing the bicycle.
  tr FS: Bisikletin bakımını yapıyor.
  EN TP: servicing a silver car
  tr TP: gümüş bir arabanın bakımını yapmak
  EN FP: servicing a washing machine
  tr FP: çamaşır makinesinin bakımını yapmak
5072 | liquid (noun): a substance that is liquid, not solid or gas | loc: sıvı
  EN TS: The brown liquid is very viscous.
  tr TS: Kahverengi sıvı çok viskoz.
  EN FS: The green liquid is very viscous.
  tr FS: Yeşil sıvı çok viskoz.
  EN TP: pouring a brown liquid
  tr TP: kahverengi bir sıvı dökmek
  EN FP: pouring a clear liquid
  tr FP: berrak bir sıvı dökmek
5073 | medicine (noun): something you take that treats an illness | loc: ilaç
  EN TS: This medicine tastes awful!
  tr TS: Bu ilacın tadı berbat!
  EN FS: This medicine tastes great!
  tr FS: Bu ilacın tadı harika!
  EN TP: a spoon of brown medicine
  tr TP: bir kaşık kahverengi ilaç
  EN FP: a medicine for a dog
  tr FP: köpek için bir ilaç
5074 | introduce (verb): to make people come to know each other | loc: tanıtmak
  EN TS: Everyone is introducing themselves to her.
  tr TS: Herkes kadına kendini tanıtıyor.
  EN FS: Everyone is introducing themselves to him.
  tr FS: Herkes adama kendini tanıtıyor.
  EN TP: introducing a new colleague
  tr TP: yeni bir iş arkadaşını tanıtmak
  EN FP: introducing a new product
  tr FP: yeni bir ürünü tanıtmak
5075 | sticky (adjective): having sticky properties, like glue | loc: yapışkan
  EN TS: Sticky hands, empty cone. "Great."
  tr TS: Yapışkan eller, boş külah. "Harika."
  EN FS: Sticky hands, full cone. "Great."
  tr FS: Yapışkan eller, dolu külah. "Harika."
  EN TP: sticky hands from ice cream
  tr TP: dondurmadan yapışkan eller
  EN FP: sticky tape on a box
  tr FP: kolide yapışkan bant
5076 | member (noun): one of the persons who joined a group | loc: üye
  EN TS: She is a new club member.
  tr TS: Kulübün yeni üyesi o.
  EN FS: She is a new band member.
  tr FS: Müzik grubunun yeni üyesi o.
  EN TP: a new club member
  tr TP: kulübün yeni üyesi
  EN FP: a member of a band
  tr FP: bir müzik grubunun üyesi
5077 | recall (verb): to bring knowledge back from your memory | loc: hatırlamak
  EN TS: He recalled every card, easy.
  tr TS: Oğlan her kartı hatırladı, çantada keklik.
  EN FS: She recalled every card, easy.
  tr FS: Kız her kartı hatırladı, çantada keklik.
  EN TP: recalling answers on cards
  tr TP: kartlardaki cevapları hatırlamak
  EN FP: recalling a broken car
  tr FP: arızalı arabayı geri çağırmak
5078 | pork (noun): meat that comes from a pig | loc: domuz eti
  EN TS: He is making pork tacos.
  tr TS: Domuz etli taco yapıyor.
  EN FS: He is making fish tacos.
  tr FS: Balıklı taco yapıyor.
  EN TP: slicing roasted pork
  tr TP: kızarmış domuz eti dilimlemek
  EN FP: pork chops in a pan
  tr FP: tavada domuz pirzolası
5079 | pyramid (noun): a huge ancient building with triangle sides | loc: piramit
  EN TS: Taco first, pyramid second.
  tr TS: Önce taco, sonra piramit.
  EN FS: Taco first, beach second.
  tr FS: Önce taco, sonra plaj.
  EN TP: a pyramid in the jungle
  tr TP: ormanda bir piramit
  EN FP: a pyramid in the desert
  tr FP: çölde bir piramit
5080 | yellow (adjective): the color between green and orange | loc: sarı
  EN TS: The yellow dress looks great.
  tr TS: Sarı elbise çok yakışmış.
  EN FS: The yellow coat looks great.
  tr FS: Sarı kaban çok yakışmış.
  EN TP: a bright yellow sundress
  tr TP: parlak sarı bir yazlık elbise
  EN FP: a bright yellow raincoat
  tr FP: parlak sarı bir yağmurluk
5081 | purple (adjective): the color between red and blue | loc: mor
  EN TS: Purple is her colour.
  tr TS: Mor tam onun rengi.
  EN FS: Green is her colour.
  tr FS: Yeşil tam onun rengi.
  EN TP: a fitted purple dress
  tr TP: vücuda oturan mor bir elbise
  EN FP: a purple silk scarf
  tr FP: mor ipek bir eşarp
5082 | hairstyle (noun): the way someone's hair is cut and arranged | loc: saç modeli
  EN TS: Two buns? Great hairstyle.
  tr TS: İki topuz mu? Harika saç modeli.
  EN FS: Two braids? Great hairstyle.
  tr FS: İki örgü mü? Harika saç modeli.
  EN TP: a hairstyle with two buns
  tr TP: iki topuzlu bir saç modeli
  EN FP: a hairstyle with a fringe
  tr FP: kâküllü bir saç modeli
5083 | berry (noun): small soft fruits that you can eat | loc: orman meyvesi
  EN TS: They are adding berries.
  tr TS: Orman meyvesi ekliyorlar.
  EN FS: They are adding nuts.
  tr FS: Kuruyemiş ekliyorlar.
  EN TP: red berries in the batter
  tr TP: hamurda kırmızı orman meyveleri
  EN FP: picking berries in a forest
  tr FP: ormanda böğürtlen toplamak
5084 | green (adjective): the color between blue and yellow | loc: yeşil
  EN TS: The green gown is stunning!
  tr TS: Yeşil gece elbisesi büyüleyici!
  EN FS: The red gown is stunning!
  tr FS: Kırmızı gece elbisesi büyüleyici!
  EN TP: a long green gown
  tr TP: uzun yeşil bir gece elbisesi
  EN FP: a green evening bag
  tr FP: yeşil bir gece çantası
5085 | statue (noun): a figure of a person or creature made of stone | loc: heykel
  EN TS: She is posing like the statue!
  tr TS: Heykel gibi poz veriyor!
  EN FS: She is posing like the guard!
  tr FS: Muhafız gibi poz veriyor!
  EN TP: a selfie with a statue
  tr TP: heykelle bir selfie
  EN FP: a selfie with a horse
  tr FP: atla bir selfie
5086 | shiny (adjective): reflecting light | loc: parlak
  EN TS: The floor is so shiny!
  tr TS: Zemin ne kadar parlak!
  EN FS: The floor is so dusty!
  tr FS: Zemin ne kadar tozlu!
  EN TP: a shiny stone floor
  tr TP: parlak bir taş zemin
  EN FP: a shiny new phone
  tr FP: parlak yeni bir telefon
5087 | dirty (adjective): covered with dirt or grime | loc: kirli
  EN TS: Paws made the floor dirty.
  tr TS: Patiler yüzünden zemin kirli.
  EN FS: Paws made the wall dirty.
  tr FS: Patiler yüzünden duvar kirli.
  EN TP: a dirty tiled floor
  tr TP: kirli, fayanslı bir zemin
  EN FP: dirty dishes in a sink
  tr FP: lavaboda kirli bulaşıklar
5088 | awake (adjective): not in a state of sleep | loc: uyanık
  EN TS: The boy is awake and yawning.
  tr TS: Çocuk uyanık ve esniyor.
  EN FS: The boy is awake and eating.
  tr FS: Çocuk uyanık ve yemek yiyor.
  EN TP: awake at sunrise
  tr TP: gün doğumunda uyanık
  EN FP: awake at midnight
  tr FP: gece yarısı uyanık
5089 | mother (noun): a woman who has given birth to a child | loc: anne
  EN TS: This mother does it all.
  tr TS: Bu anne her şeyi yapıyor.
  EN FS: This father does it all.
  tr FS: Bu baba her şeyi yapıyor.
  EN TP: a mother flipping pancakes
  tr TP: krep çeviren bir anne
  EN FP: a mother buying pancakes
  tr FP: krep satın alan bir anne
5090 | nursery (noun): a room in a home for a baby | loc: bebek odası
  EN TS: A cosy nursery full of toys.
  tr TS: Oyuncak dolu, sıcacık bir bebek odası.
  EN FS: A cosy kitchen full of toys.
  tr FS: Oyuncak dolu, sıcacık bir mutfak.
  EN TP: a nursery with a cot
  tr TP: beşikli bir bebek odası
  EN FP: a plant nursery
  tr FP: bir fidanlık
5091 | motorbike (noun): a two-wheeled motor vehicle you ride | loc: motosiklet
  EN TS: The small motorbike is green.
  tr TS: Küçük motosiklet yeşil.
  EN FS: The small motorbike is red.
  tr FS: Küçük motosiklet kırmızı.
  EN TP: a green motorbike in town
  tr TP: şehirde yeşil bir motosiklet
  EN FP: a green motorbike for sale
  tr FP: satılık yeşil bir motosiklet
5092 | helper (noun): a person who helps someone | loc: yardımcı
  EN TS: Our helper moves boxes like a pro.
  tr TS: Yardımcımız kolileri profesyonel gibi taşıyor.
  EN FS: Our helper moves plants like a pro.
  tr FS: Yardımcımız bitkileri profesyonel gibi taşıyor.
  EN TP: a helper with a box
  tr TP: koli taşıyan bir yardımcı
  EN FP: a helper with a lamp
  tr FP: lamba taşıyan bir yardımcı
5093 | overgrown (adjective): covered by plants growing out of control | loc: otlarla kaplı
  EN TS: The lawn was a bit overgrown.
  tr TS: Bahçe birazcık otlarla kaplıydı.
  EN FS: The pool was a bit overgrown.
  tr FS: Havuz birazcık otlarla kaplıydı.
  EN TP: mowing overgrown grass
  tr TP: otlarla kaplı çimi biçmek
  EN FP: an overgrown hedge
  tr FP: otlarla kaplı bir çit
5094 | skinny (adjective): being very thin | loc: sıska
  EN TS: He is flexing his skinny arm.
  tr TS: Sıska kolunu kasıyor.
  EN FS: He is flexing his skinny leg.
  tr FS: Sıska bacağını kasıyor.
  EN TP: flexing a skinny arm
  tr TP: sıska bir kolu kasmak
  EN FP: wearing skinny jeans
  tr FP: dar kot pantolon giymek
5095 | awe (noun): a huge feeling of wonder at something | loc: hayranlık
  EN TS: He is staring up in awe!
  tr TS: Hayranlıkla yukarı bakıyor!
  EN FS: He is staring down in awe!
  tr FS: Hayranlıkla aşağı bakıyor!
  EN TP: awe at a giant skeleton
  tr TP: dev bir iskelete hayranlık
  EN FP: awe at a tiny coin
  tr FP: minik bir madeni paraya hayranlık
5096 | ground (noun): the solid surface of the earth you stand on | loc: yer
  EN TS: Mushrooms grow in the ground.
  tr TS: Mantarlar yerden bitiyor.
  EN FS: Mushrooms grow in the water.
  tr FS: Mantarlar sudan bitiyor.
  EN TP: a mushroom on the ground
  tr TP: yerde bir mantar
  EN FP: a mushroom on a pizza
  tr FP: pizzada bir mantar
5097 | music (noun): an art form of instrumental or vocal tones | loc: müzik
  EN TS: His music stopped the street.
  tr TS: Müziği sokağı durdurdu.
  EN FS: His music emptied the street.
  tr FS: Müziği sokağı boşalttı.
  EN TP: street music
  tr TP: sokak müziği
  EN FP: a music shop
  tr FP: bir müzik dükkânı
5098 | national (adjective): belonging to one nation or country | loc: ulusal
  EN TS: He loves his national team.
  tr TS: Adam ulusal takımına bayılıyor.
  EN FS: She loves her national team.
  tr FS: Kadın ulusal takımına bayılıyor.
  EN TP: national colours on a face
  tr TP: yüzde ulusal renkler
  EN FP: a national holiday
  tr FP: ulusal bir bayram
5099 | photo (noun): a print of a person or scene | loc: fotoğraf
  EN TS: Everyone is adding a photo!
  tr TS: Herkes bir fotoğraf ekliyor!
  EN FS: Everyone is adding a stamp!
  tr FS: Herkes bir pul ekliyor!
  EN TP: photos on a world map
  tr TP: dünya haritasında fotoğraflar
  EN FP: a photo album
  tr FP: bir fotoğraf albümü
5100 | stick (verb): to put or fix something in place | loc: tutturmak
  EN TS: They are sticking photos on a map.
  tr TS: Fotoğrafları haritaya tutturuyorlar.
  EN FS: They are sticking photos on a door.
  tr FS: Fotoğrafları kapıya tutturuyorlar.
  EN TP: sticking photos on a map
  tr TP: fotoğrafları haritaya tutturmak
  EN FP: sticking maps on the wall
  tr FP: haritaları duvara tutturmak
5101 | nausea (noun): the sick feeling that you may vomit | loc: mide bulantısı
  EN TS: Nausea is winning this trip.
  tr TS: Bu yolculukta mide bulantısı önde.
  EN FS: Nausea is winning this flight.
  tr FS: Bu uçuşta mide bulantısı önde.
  EN TP: nausea on a ferry
  tr TP: vapurda mide bulantısı
  EN FP: nausea in a car
  tr FP: arabada mide bulantısı
5102 | alley (noun): a very narrow street between buildings | loc: ara sokak
  EN TS: This alley is super narrow!
  tr TS: Bu ara sokak aşırı dar!
  EN FS: This alley is super wide!
  tr FS: Bu ara sokak aşırı geniş!
  EN TP: a narrow medina alley
  tr TP: dar bir medine ara sokağı
  EN FP: an alley full of cats
  tr FP: kedilerle dolu bir ara sokak
5103 | neck (noun): the part that connects the head to the body | loc: boyun
  EN TS: A giraffe's neck is over her!
  tr TS: Bir zürafanın boynu tam üstünde!
  EN FS: A horse's neck is over her!
  tr FS: Bir atın boynu tam üstünde!
  EN TP: a giraffe's long neck
  tr TP: zürafanın uzun boynu
  EN FP: a snake around her neck
  tr FP: boynunda bir yılan
5104 | talk (noun): a conversation where people exchange ideas | loc: sohbet
  EN TS: Their talk is friendly.
  tr TS: Sohbetleri dostça.
  EN FS: Their talk is angry.
  tr FS: Sohbetleri öfkeli.
  EN TP: a talk over the fence
  tr TP: çitin üstünden sohbet
  EN FP: a talk at a conference
  tr FP: konferansta bir konuşma
5105 | ditch (noun): a long narrow channel dug into the earth | loc: hendek
  EN TS: A ditch full of ducks.
  tr TS: Ördek dolu bir hendek.
  EN FS: A ditch full of boats.
  tr FS: Tekne dolu bir hendek.
  EN TP: a straight water ditch
  tr TP: düz bir su hendeği
  EN FP: a ditch by a motorway
  tr FP: otoyol kenarında bir hendek
5106 | windmill (noun): a building with big sails turned by the wind | loc: yel değirmeni
  EN TS: Windmill, tulips, stroopwafel: done.
  tr TS: Yel değirmeni, laleler, stroopwafel: tamam.
  EN FS: Windmill, tulips, pizza slice: done.
  tr FS: Yel değirmeni, laleler, pizza dilimi: tamam.
  EN TP: a turning windmill
  tr TP: dönen bir yel değirmeni
  EN FP: a windmill on a beach
  tr FP: sahilde bir yel değirmeni
5107 | cradle (verb): to hold someone gently in your arms | loc: kucağında sallamak
  EN TS: Both are cradling the baby.
  tr TS: İkisi de bebeği kucağında sallıyor.
  EN FS: Both are washing the baby.
  tr FS: İkisi de bebeği yıkıyor.
  EN TP: to cradle a newborn
  tr TP: yeni doğanı kucağında sallamak
  EN FP: to cradle a teacup
  tr FP: bir çay fincanını iki eliyle tutmak
5108 | village (noun): a place where people live, smaller than a town | loc: köy
  EN TS: The village is on the water.
  tr TS: Köy suyun üstünde.
  EN FS: The village is on the hill.
  tr FS: Köy tepenin üstünde.
  EN TP: a village on stilts
  tr TP: kazıklar üstünde bir köy
  EN FP: a village in the snow
  tr FP: karlar içinde bir köy
5109 | sweet (adjective): having the taste of sugar | loc: tatlı
  EN TS: A dozen sweet cupcakes, and she is eating alone.
  tr TS: Bir düzine tatlı kek, o da tek başına yiyor.
  EN FS: A dozen sweet cookies, and she is eating alone.
  tr FS: Bir düzine tatlı kurabiye, o da tek başına yiyor.
  EN TP: a tray of sweet cupcakes
  tr TP: bir tepsi tatlı kek
  EN FP: a sweet cup of tea
  tr FP: tatlı bir fincan çay
5110 | quiet (adjective): with almost no activity going on | loc: sakin
  EN TS: The park is very quiet.
  tr TS: Park çok sakin.
  EN FS: The beach is very quiet.
  tr FS: Sahil çok sakin.
  EN TP: a quiet misty park
  tr TP: sisli, sakin bir park
  EN FP: a quiet misty beach
  tr FP: sisli, sakin bir sahil
5111 | nurse (verb): to care for someone who is ill | loc: bakmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is nursing a sick child.
  tr TS: Hasta bir çocuğa bakıyor.
  EN FS: She is nursing a sick puppy.
  tr FS: Hasta bir yavru köpeğe bakıyor.
  EN TP: nursing a sick child
  tr TP: hasta bir çocuğa bakmak
  EN FP: nursing a glass of water
  tr FP: bir bardak suya bakmak
5112 | grain (noun): a small particle of a substance | loc: tane
  EN TS: Grains are flying in the air.
  tr TS: Taneler havada uçuşuyor.
  EN FS: Grains are flying into a cup.
  tr FS: Taneler bir fincanın içine uçuşuyor.
  EN TP: falling grains of rice
  tr TP: düşen pirinç taneleri
  EN FP: a grain of sand
  tr FP: bir kum tanesi
5113 | advice (noun): an idea about the best action to take | loc: tavsiye
  EN TS: Good advice: eat more fish.
  tr TS: İyi bir tavsiye: daha çok balık ye.
  EN FS: Good advice: eat more cake.
  tr FS: İyi bir tavsiye: daha çok pasta ye.
  EN TP: advice about healthy food
  tr TP: sağlıklı beslenme tavsiyesi
  EN FP: advice about money
  tr FP: para konusunda tavsiye
5114 | flamingo (noun): a tall pink water bird with a bent beak | loc: flamingo
  EN TS: The flamingos are flying away.
  tr TS: Flamingolar uçup gidiyor.
  EN FS: The swans are flying away.
  tr FS: Kuğular uçup gidiyor.
  EN TP: a flock of flamingos
  tr TP: bir flamingo sürüsü
  EN FP: a flamingo in a zoo
  tr FP: hayvanat bahçesinde bir flamingo
5115 | study (verb): to look at something in detail | loc: incelemek
  EN TS: She is studying an insect.
  tr TS: Bir böceği inceliyor.
  EN FS: She is studying a flower.
  tr FS: Bir çiçeği inceliyor.
  EN TP: studying a small insect
  tr TP: küçük bir böceği incelemek
  EN FP: studying for an exam
  tr FP: sınav için ders çalışmak
5116 | to open (verb): to make something become open | loc: açmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is opening all the windows!
  tr TS: Bütün pencereleri açıyor!
  EN FS: He is closing all the windows!
  tr FS: Bütün pencereleri kapatıyor!
  EN TP: to open the windows
  tr TP: pencereleri açmak
  EN FP: to open a present
  tr FP: bir hediye açmak
5117 | bookstore (noun): a shop where books are sold | loc: kitapçı
  EN TS: He loves this bookstore!
  tr TS: Bu kitapçıya bayılıyor!
  EN FS: He hates this bookstore!
  tr FS: Bu kitapçıdan nefret ediyor!
  EN TP: a packed old bookstore
  tr TP: tıklım tıklım eski bir kitapçı
  EN FP: a bookstore closing down
  tr FP: kapanan bir kitapçı
5118 | sunlight (noun): the light that comes from the sun | loc: gün ışığı
  EN TS: Sunlight is pouring over him. What a morning!
  tr TS: Üstüne gün ışığı yağıyor. Ne sabah ama!
  EN FS: Rain is pouring over him. What a morning!
  tr FS: Üstüne yağmur yağıyor. Ne sabah ama!
  EN TP: sunlight through a window
  tr TP: pencereden gelen gün ışığı
  EN FP: sunlight through the trees
  tr FP: ağaçların arasından gün ışığı
5119 | entrance (noun): something that gives you a way to get in | loc: giriş
  EN TS: The entrance has wooden gates.
  tr TS: Girişte ahşap kapılar var.
  EN FS: The entrance has glass gates.
  tr FS: Girişte cam kapılar var.
  EN TP: the park entrance
  tr TP: park girişi
  EN FP: the museum entrance
  tr FP: müze girişi
5120 | surgeon (noun): a doctor who does surgery | loc: cerrah
  EN TS: All done! The surgeons are happy.
  tr TS: Bitti! Cerrahlar mutlu.
  EN FS: All done! The bakers are happy.
  tr FS: Bitti! Fırıncılar mutlu.
  EN TP: surgeons around a patient
  tr TP: hastanın başında cerrahlar
  EN FP: surgeons in a waiting room
  tr FP: bekleme salonunda cerrahlar
5121 | remove (verb): to take something off or out by lifting it | loc: çıkarmak
  EN TS: She is removing the muffins.
  tr TS: Muffinleri fırından çıkarıyor.
  EN FS: She is removing the cookies.
  tr FS: Kurabiyeleri fırından çıkarıyor.
  EN TP: removing a tray of muffins
  tr TP: bir tepsi muffini çıkarmak
  EN FP: removing the oven door
  tr FP: fırın kapağını çıkarmak
5122 | achieve (verb): to gain something by real effort | loc: başarmak
  EN TS: They all achieved their goals.
  tr TS: Hepsi başardı, hedeflerine ulaştılar.
  EN FS: They all missed their goals.
  tr FS: Hepsi kaçırdı, hedeflerine ulaşamadılar.
  EN TP: achieving a hard goal
  tr TP: zor bir hedefi başarmak
  EN FP: achieving good grades
  tr FP: iyi notlar almayı başarmak
5123 | flood (verb): to fill something too quickly and spill over | loc: sular altında bırakmak
  EN TS: Coffee, sink and bath are all flooding!
  tr TS: Kahve, lavabo ve küvet taşıp her yeri sular altında bırakıyor!
  EN FS: Coffee, sink and oven are all flooding!
  tr FS: Kahve, lavabo ve fırın taşıp her yeri sular altında bırakıyor!
  EN TP: a flooding bathtub
  tr TP: banyoyu sular altında bırakan küvet
  EN FP: a flooded road after rain
  tr FP: yağmurdan sonra sular altında kalan yol
5124 | marathon (noun): a running race of about 42 kilometres | loc: maraton
  EN TS: Marathon in the old town.
  tr TS: Eski şehirde maraton.
  EN FS: Marathon in the forest.
  tr FS: Ormanda maraton.
  EN TP: running a city marathon
  tr TP: şehir maratonu koşmak
  EN FP: a movie marathon
  tr FP: bir film maratonu
5125 | stage (verb): to perform a play on a stage | loc: sahnelemek
  EN TS: They are staging a revolution!
  tr TS: Bir devrim sahneliyorlar!
  EN FS: They are staging a wedding!
  tr FS: Bir düğün sahneliyorlar!
  EN TP: staging an old play
  tr TP: eski bir oyunu sahnelemek
  EN FP: staging a protest
  tr FP: bir protesto sahnelemek
5126 | business (noun): a company and the people who work in it | loc: işletme | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is proud of his business.
  tr TS: İşletmesiyle gurur duyuyor.
  EN FS: He is proud of his car.
  tr FS: Arabasıyla gurur duyuyor.
  EN TP: a small corner business
  tr TP: köşede küçük bir işletme
  EN FP: a big online business
  tr FP: büyük bir online işletme
5127 | shut (verb): to move a lid so an opening is closed | loc: kapatmak
  EN TS: The suitcase won't shut!
  tr TS: Bavulu bir türlü kapatamıyor!
  EN FS: The suitcase won't open!
  tr FS: Bavulu bir türlü açamıyor!
  EN TP: to shut a full suitcase
  tr TP: dolu bir bavulu kapatmak
  EN FP: to shut a window
  tr FP: bir pencereyi kapatmak
5128 | hurt (noun): damage to the body from an accident | loc: yara
  EN TS: The sofa caused real hurt!
  tr TS: Kanepe gerçek bir yara açtı!
  EN FS: The table caused real hurt!
  tr FS: Masa gerçek bir yara açtı!
  EN TP: hurt from the sofa corner
  tr TP: kanepe köşesinden yara
  EN FP: hurt from a football game
  tr FP: futbol maçından yara
5129 | cover (noun): a sheet put over a thing to shelter it | loc: örtü
  EN TS: The furniture is under covers.
  tr TS: Mobilyalar örtülerin altında.
  EN FS: The furniture is under towels.
  tr FS: Mobilyalar havluların altında.
  EN TP: grey covers on furniture
  tr TP: mobilyalarda gri örtüler
  EN FP: a cover on a book
  tr FP: bir kitap kabı
5130 | kite (noun): a cloth wing on strings pulled by the wind | loc: uçurtma
  EN TS: His kite is flying so high!
  tr TS: Uçurtması öyle yüksekte uçuyor ki!
  EN FS: His drone is flying so high!
  tr FS: Dronu öyle yüksekte uçuyor ki!
  EN TP: flying a kite
  tr TP: uçurtma uçurmak
  EN FP: a kite in a tree
  tr FP: ağaca takılmış bir uçurtma
5131 | focus (verb): to direct your attention on something | loc: odaklanmak
  EN TS: He is focusing on the ball.
  tr TS: Topa odaklanıyor.
  EN FS: He is focusing on the boys.
  tr FS: Çocuklara odaklanıyor.
  EN TP: focusing on the ball
  tr TP: topa odaklanmak
  EN FP: focusing on the crowd
  tr FP: kalabalığa odaklanmak
5132 | mixture (noun): a substance of two or more things mixed together | loc: karışım
  EN TS: He is pouring the mixture.
  tr TS: Karışımı döküyor.
  EN FS: He is stirring the mixture.
  tr FS: Karışımı karıştırıyor.
  EN TP: pancake mixture in a pan
  tr TP: tavada krep karışımı
  EN FP: a mixture of paint colours
  tr FP: boya renklerinin karışımı
5133 | scream (verb): to cry out very loudly in fear | loc: çığlık atmak
  EN TS: She is screaming in the park.
  tr TS: Parkta çığlık atıyor.
  EN FS: She is screaming in the pool.
  tr FS: Havuzda çığlık atıyor.
  EN TP: screaming in a freeze game
  tr TP: heykel oyununda çığlık atmak
  EN FP: screaming at a horror film
  tr FP: korku filminde çığlık atmak
5134 | parent (noun): a father or mother of a child | loc: ebeveyn
  EN TS: The parents are a bit busy.
  tr TS: Ebeveynler biraz meşgul.
  EN FS: The dogs are a bit busy.
  tr FS: Köpekler biraz meşgul.
  EN TP: parents feeding a baby
  tr TP: bebeği besleyen ebeveynler
  EN FP: parents feeding the ducks
  tr FP: ördekleri besleyen ebeveynler
5135 | space (noun): an area kept for one particular purpose | loc: yer
  EN TS: Tight space, perfect parking.
  tr TS: Dar yer, kusursuz park.
  EN FS: Wide space, perfect parking.
  tr FS: Geniş yer, kusursuz park.
  EN TP: a tight parking space
  tr TP: dar bir park yeri
  EN FP: a space rocket launch
  tr FP: uzay roketi fırlatma
5136 | debate (noun): a discussion with reasons for and against | loc: tartışma
  EN TS: The debate is getting loud!
  tr TS: Tartışmanın sesi yükseliyor!
  EN FS: The debate is getting quiet!
  tr FS: Tartışmanın sesi alçalıyor!
  EN TP: a loud debate
  tr TP: gürültülü bir tartışma
  EN FP: a debate on TV
  tr FP: televizyonda bir tartışma
5137 | parliament (noun): the building where politicians make laws | loc: parlamento
  EN TS: The parliament is full today.
  tr TS: Parlamento bugün dolu.
  EN FS: The parliament is empty today.
  tr FS: Parlamento bugün boş.
  EN TP: a full parliament
  tr TP: dolu bir parlamento
  EN FP: an empty parliament
  tr FP: boş bir parlamento
5138 | train (noun): railway cars joined together that carry people | loc: tren
  EN TS: She is on the train now.
  tr TS: Şu an trende.
  EN FS: She is on the bus now.
  tr FS: Şu an otobüste.
  EN TP: a seat on the train
  tr TP: trende bir koltuk
  EN FP: a seat on the plane
  tr FP: uçakta bir koltuk
5139 | blank (adjective): with nothing written or printed on it | loc: boş
  EN TS: The pages were blank at first.
  tr TS: Sayfalar başta boştu.
  EN FS: The pages were full at first.
  tr FS: Sayfalar başta doluydu.
  EN TP: a blank passport page
  tr TP: boş bir pasaport sayfası
  EN FP: a blank face
  tr FP: boş bir yüz ifadesi
5140 | allow (verb): to give someone permission to do something | loc: izin vermek
  EN TS: The stamp allows her to enter.
  tr TS: Damga girmesine izin veriyor.
  EN FS: The stamp allows her to drive.
  tr FS: Damga araba kullanmasına izin veriyor.
  EN TP: allowed to enter
  tr TP: girişe izin verilmiş
  EN FP: allowed to smoke
  tr FP: sigaraya izin verilmiş
5141 | doctor (noun): a person licensed to give medical care | loc: doktor
  EN TS: The doctor has a stethoscope.
  tr TS: Doktorun elinde stetoskop var.
  EN FS: The doctor has a camera.
  tr FS: Doktorun elinde kamera var.
  EN TP: a doctor with a stethoscope
  tr TP: stetoskoplu bir doktor
  EN FP: a doctor in an ambulance
  tr FP: ambulansta bir doktor
5142 | neighborhood (noun): the streets and houses around your home | loc: mahalle
  EN TS: The neighborhood is decorated.
  tr TS: Mahalle süslenmiş.
  EN FS: The neighborhood is empty.
  tr FS: Mahalle bomboş.
  EN TP: a decorated neighborhood
  tr TP: süslenmiş bir mahalle
  EN FP: a neighborhood yard sale
  tr FP: mahallede ikinci el pazarı
5143 | peace (noun): the state of having no war | loc: barış
  EN TS: The soldiers are making peace.
  tr TS: Askerler barış yapıyor.
  EN FS: The soldiers are making war.
  tr FS: Askerler savaş yapıyor.
  EN TP: making peace
  tr TP: barış yapmak
  EN FP: peace and quiet at home
  tr FP: evde huzur ve sükûn
5144 | dove (noun): the white bird used as a sign of peace | loc: güvercin
  EN TS: The girls are releasing doves!
  tr TS: Kızlar güvercinleri uçuruyor!
  EN FS: The boys are releasing doves!
  tr FS: Oğlanlar güvercinleri uçuruyor!
  EN TP: releasing white doves
  tr TP: beyaz güvercinleri uçurmak
  EN FP: feeding white doves
  tr FP: beyaz güvercinleri beslemek
5145 | tram (noun): an electric city train on rails in the street | loc: tramvay
  EN TS: The tram is right behind him.
  tr TS: Tramvay tam arkasında.
  EN FS: The bus is right behind him.
  tr FS: Otobüs tam arkasında.
  EN TP: a tram on the square
  tr TP: meydanda bir tramvay
  EN FP: a tram on a bridge
  tr FP: köprüde bir tramvay
5146 | strip (noun): a long narrow piece of something | loc: şerit
  EN TS: The peel is one long strip!
  tr TS: Kabuk tek, uzun bir şerit!
  EN FS: The peel is two short strips!
  tr FS: Kabuk iki kısa şerit!
  EN TP: a long strip of peel
  tr TP: uzun bir kabuk şeridi
  EN FP: a strip of tape
  tr FP: bir bant şeridi
5147 | people (noun): any group of human beings together | loc: insanlar
  EN TS: So many people are crossing!
  tr TS: Ne çok insan karşıya geçiyor!
  EN FS: So many cars are crossing!
  tr FS: Ne çok araba karşıya geçiyor!
  EN TP: people filling the crossing
  tr TP: yaya geçidini dolduran insanlar
  EN FP: people waiting for a bus
  tr FP: otobüs bekleyen insanlar
5148 | morning (noun): the time between dawn and noon | loc: sabah
  EN TS: Good morning, empty city!
  tr TS: Hayırlı sabahlar, bomboş şehir!
  EN FS: Good night, empty city!
  tr FS: Hayırlı geceler, bomboş şehir!
  EN TP: an empty morning street
  tr TP: bomboş bir sabah sokağı
  EN FP: a busy morning street
  tr FP: kalabalık bir sabah sokağı
5149 | pharmacy (noun): a shop where you buy medicine | loc: eczane
  EN TS: What a big old pharmacy!
  tr TS: Ne büyük, eski bir eczane!
  EN FS: What a big old bakery!
  tr FS: Ne büyük, eski bir fırın!
  EN TP: a grand old pharmacy
  tr TP: görkemli, eski bir eczane
  EN FP: a pharmacy in a hospital
  tr FP: hastanede bir eczane
5150 | prescription (noun): directions a doctor writes down beforehand | loc: reçete
  EN TS: He is presenting a prescription.
  tr TS: Reçetesini ibraz ediyor.
  EN FS: He is presenting a train ticket.
  tr FS: Tren biletini ibraz ediyor.
  EN TP: handing over a prescription
  tr TP: reçeteyi uzatmak
  EN FP: writing a prescription
  tr FP: reçete yazmak
5151 | frame (noun): a decorated border that surrounds a picture | loc: çerçeve
  EN TS: The frame is silver.
  tr TS: Çerçeve gümüş.
  EN FS: The frame is gold.
  tr FS: Çerçeve altın.
  EN TP: a silver picture frame
  tr TP: gümüş bir resim çerçevesi
  EN FP: a silver window frame
  tr FP: gümüş bir pencere çerçevesi
5152 | bedroom (noun): the room you sleep in | loc: yatak odası
  EN TS: Her bedroom is all pillows!
  tr TS: Yatak odası baştan aşağı yastık!
  EN FS: Her bedroom is all books!
  tr FS: Yatak odası baştan aşağı kitap!
  EN TP: pillows in the bedroom
  tr TP: yatak odasında yastıklar
  EN FP: pillows in the living room
  tr FP: oturma odasında yastıklar
5153 | bed (noun): a plot of ground where plants are growing | loc: tarh
  EN TS: The team is planting the bed.
  tr TS: Ekip tarhı ekiyor.
  EN FS: The team is painting the bed.
  tr FS: Ekip tarhı boyuyor.
  EN TP: a raised garden bed
  tr TP: yükseltilmiş bir bahçe tarhı
  EN FP: an unmade bed
  tr FP: toplanmamış bir yatak
5154 | houseplant (noun): a plant kept indoors in a pot for decoration | loc: ev bitkisi
  EN TS: His houseplants are a jungle.
  tr TS: Ev bitkileri resmen orman olmuş.
  EN FS: His books are a jungle.
  tr FS: Kitapları resmen orman olmuş.
  EN TP: a room full of houseplants
  tr TP: ev bitkileriyle dolu bir oda
  EN FP: a houseplant for sale
  tr FP: satılık bir ev bitkisi
5155 | lunch (noun): a meal eaten in the middle of the day | loc: öğle yemeği
  EN TS: Lunch for the whole family!
  tr TS: Bütün aileye öğle yemeği!
  EN FS: Lunch for just two people!
  tr FS: Sadece iki kişiye öğle yemeği!
  EN TP: a big family lunch
  tr TP: kalabalık bir aile öğle yemeği
  EN FP: a quick lunch at work
  tr FP: işte hızlı bir öğle yemeği
5156 | kneel (verb): to go down and rest on your knees | loc: diz çökmek
  EN TS: He scored, so he is kneeling.
  tr TS: Gol attı, o yüzden diz çöküyor.
  EN FS: He missed, so he is kneeling.
  tr FS: Kaçırdı, o yüzden diz çöküyor.
  EN TP: kneeling on the grass
  tr TP: çimlere diz çökmek
  EN FP: kneeling to pray
  tr FP: dua etmek için diz çökmek
5157 | neighbourhood (noun): the nearby area around where you live | loc: semt
  EN TS: The whole neighbourhood is playing football!
  tr TS: Bütün semt futbol oynuyor!
  EN FS: The whole neighbourhood is playing volleyball!
  tr FS: Bütün semt voleybol oynuyor!
  EN TP: a neighbourhood football game
  tr TP: semtte bir futbol maçı
  EN FP: a neighbourhood bike race
  tr FP: semtte bir bisiklet yarışı
5158 | connect (verb): to join two people or things together | loc: bağlamak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is connecting the cables.
  tr TS: Kabloları bağlıyor.
  EN FS: He is cutting the cables.
  tr FS: Kabloları kesiyor.
  EN TP: connecting a gaming setup
  tr TP: oyun sistemini bağlamak
  EN FP: connecting with friends
  tr FP: arkadaşlarla bağ kurmak
5159 | wet (verb): to make something wet | loc: ıslatmak
  EN TS: The pipe wet him on purpose.
  tr TS: Boru onu bilerek ıslattı.
  EN FS: The dog wet him on purpose.
  tr FS: Köpek onu bilerek ıslattı.
  EN TP: wetting the plumber's face
  tr TP: tesisatçının yüzünü ıslatmak
  EN FP: wetting the kitchen plants
  tr FP: mutfaktaki bitkileri ıslatmak
5160 | dash (verb): to run or move very quickly | loc: koşturmak
  EN TS: He's dashing through the rain.
  tr TS: Yağmurda koşturuyor.
  EN FS: He's dashing through the snow.
  tr FS: Karda koşturuyor.
  EN TP: dashing past pigeons
  tr TP: güvercinlerin yanından koşturmak
  EN FP: dashing past the police
  tr FP: polisin yanından koşturmak
5161 | cathedral (noun): a very large and important church | loc: katedral
  EN TS: He stands before a cathedral.
  tr TS: Bir katedralin önünde duruyor.
  EN FS: He stands before a castle.
  tr FS: Bir şatonun önünde duruyor.
  EN TP: a brick cathedral tower
  tr TP: tuğla bir katedral kulesi
  EN FP: inside a dark cathedral
  tr FP: karanlık bir katedralin içi
5162 | beautiful (adjective): delighting the senses, very nice to look at | loc: güzel
  EN TS: Beautiful views and dumplings.
  tr TS: Güzel manzaralar ve mantı.
  EN FS: Beautiful views and pancakes.
  tr FS: Güzel manzaralar ve krep.
  EN TP: a beautiful mountain lake
  tr TP: güzel bir dağ gölü
  EN FP: a beautiful beach
  tr FP: güzel bir plaj
5163 | politician (noun): a leader who works in government | loc: politikacı
  EN TS: Politicians, arguing as usual.
  tr TS: Politikacılar, her zamanki gibi tartışıyor.
  EN FS: Politicians, hugging as usual.
  tr FS: Politikacılar, her zamanki gibi sarılıyor.
  EN TP: angry politicians pointing
  tr TP: parmak sallayan öfkeli politikacılar
  EN FP: politicians shaking hands
  tr FP: tokalaşan politikacılar
5164 | campaign (noun): a race between candidates for office | loc: kampanya
  EN TS: This campaign has it all: posters, debates, confetti.
  tr TS: Bu kampanyada her şey var: afişler, tartışmalar, konfeti.
  EN FS: This campaign has it all: posters, debates, fireworks.
  tr FS: Bu kampanyada her şey var: afişler, tartışmalar, havai fişekler.
  EN TP: an election campaign
  tr TP: bir seçim kampanyası
  EN FP: a campaign against smoking
  tr FP: sigara karşıtı bir kampanya
5165 | plastic (noun): a material that can be molded into objects | loc: plastik
  EN TS: The river is full of plastic.
  tr TS: Nehir plastikle dolu.
  EN FS: The river is full of fish.
  tr FS: Nehir balıkla dolu.
  EN TP: plastic in the river
  tr TP: nehirde plastik
  EN FP: plastic in a recycling bin
  tr FP: geri dönüşüm kutusunda plastik
5166 | track (noun): the pair of rails that wheels run along | loc: ray
  EN TS: The tram is on the tracks.
  tr TS: Tramvay rayların üstünde.
  EN FS: The tram is on the grass.
  tr FS: Tramvay çimlerin üstünde.
  EN TP: tram tracks in the cobbles
  tr TP: parke taşlarında tramvay rayları
  EN FP: tram tracks in a tunnel
  tr FP: tünelde tramvay rayları
5167 | tile (noun): a flat square piece covering a floor | loc: karo
  EN TS: He is touching the blue tiles.
  tr TS: Mavi karolara dokunuyor.
  EN FS: He is touching the red tiles.
  tr FS: Kırmızı karolara dokunuyor.
  EN TP: blue-and-white wall tiles
  tr TP: mavi beyaz duvar karoları
  EN FP: tiles on a bathroom floor
  tr FP: banyo zemininde karolar
5168 | batch (noun): all the cakes baked at the same time | loc: parti
  EN TS: The batch of tarts is okay.
  tr TS: Bu parti tartlar fena değil.
  EN FS: The batch of bread is okay.
  tr FS: Bu parti ekmekler fena değil.
  EN TP: a batch of custard tarts
  tr TP: bir parti muhallebili tart
  EN FP: a batch of cookies
  tr FP: bir parti kurabiye
5169 | mail (verb): to send something by the postal service | loc: postalamak
  EN TS: He is mailing a postcard.
  tr TS: Bir kartpostal postalıyor.
  EN FS: He is mailing a package.
  tr FS: Bir paket postalıyor.
  EN TP: mailing a postcard
  tr TP: kartpostal postalamak
  EN FP: mailing a parcel
  tr FP: koli postalamak
5170 | package (noun): a wrapped container you send or give | loc: paket
  EN TS: He is handing over a package.
  tr TS: Bir paket uzatıyor.
  EN FS: He is handing over a pizza.
  tr FS: Bir pizza uzatıyor.
  EN TP: a wrapped birthday package
  tr TP: sarılı bir doğum günü paketi
  EN FP: a package holiday
  tr FP: bir tur paketi
5171 | add (verb): to join one thing to a group of others | loc: eklemek | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: He is adding stock to the pot.
  tr TS: Tencereye et suyu ekliyor.
  EN FS: He is adding milk to the pot.
  tr FS: Tencereye süt ekliyor.
  EN TP: adding vegetables to the pot
  tr TP: tencereye sebze eklemek
  EN FP: adding salt to the soup
  tr FP: çorbaya tuz eklemek
5172 | bang (verb): to hit something hard and violently | loc: vurmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Poor dough! He is banging it.
  tr TS: Zavallı hamur! Ona vurup duruyor.
  EN FS: Poor door! He is banging it.
  tr FS: Zavallı kapı! Ona vurup duruyor.
  EN TP: banging on bread dough
  tr TP: ekmek hamuruna vurmak
  EN FP: banging on the front door
  tr FP: sokak kapısına vurmak
5173 | raincoat (noun): a waterproof coat you wear in the rain | loc: yağmurluk
  EN TS: Good thing she has a raincoat.
  tr TS: İyi ki yağmurluğu var.
  EN FS: Good thing she has a sun hat.
  tr FS: İyi ki güneş şapkası var.
  EN TP: a red hooded raincoat
  tr TP: kırmızı kapüşonlu bir yağmurluk
  EN FP: a raincoat on a hook
  tr FP: askıda bir yağmurluk
5174 | cheerful (adjective): bright and happy in a way that lifts you | loc: neşeli
  EN TS: It is a cheerful dinner.
  tr TS: Neşeli bir akşam yemeği.
  EN FS: It is a cheerful breakfast.
  tr FS: Neşeli bir kahvaltı.
  EN TP: a cheerful family dinner
  tr TP: neşeli bir aile yemeği
  EN FP: a cheerful office party
  tr FP: neşeli bir ofis partisi
5175 | moustache (noun): the hair a man grows on his upper lip | loc: bıyık
  EN TS: Nice moustache, steady hands.
  tr TS: Güzel bıyık, sağlam eller.
  EN FS: Nice beard, steady hands.
  tr FS: Güzel sakal, sağlam eller.
  EN TP: a waiter with a moustache
  tr TP: bıyıklı bir garson
  EN FP: a waiter shaving his moustache
  tr FP: bıyığını tıraş eden garson
5176 | mug (noun): a big cup with a handle for hot drinks | loc: kupa
  EN TS: Hot coffee in a big mug.
  tr TS: Büyük bir kupada sıcak kahve.
  EN FS: Hot tea in a big mug.
  tr FS: Büyük bir kupada sıcak çay.
  EN TP: a big white mug
  tr TP: büyük beyaz bir kupa
  EN FP: a mug with no handle
  tr FP: kulpsuz bir kupa
5177 | teapot (noun): a container with a spout for pouring tea | loc: demlik
  EN TS: She is pouring from a teapot.
  tr TS: Demlikten dolduruyor.
  EN FS: She is pouring from a bottle.
  tr FS: Şişeden dolduruyor.
  EN TP: pouring from a white teapot
  tr TP: beyaz bir demlikten doldurmak
  EN FP: a teapot on the stove
  tr FP: ocakta bir demlik
5178 | headscarf (noun): a cloth wrapped around the head | loc: başörtüsü
  EN TS: She is baking in a headscarf.
  tr TS: Başörtüsüyle ekmek pişiriyor.
  EN FS: She is baking in a hat.
  tr FS: Şapkasıyla ekmek pişiriyor.
  EN TP: a navy headscarf
  tr TP: lacivert bir başörtüsü
  EN FP: a headscarf in the wind
  tr FP: rüzgârda bir başörtüsü
5179 | reach (verb): to move your arm forward to touch something | loc: uzanmak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She is reaching into the oven.
  tr TS: Fırının içine uzanıyor.
  EN FS: She is reaching into a fridge.
  tr FS: Buzdolabının içine uzanıyor.
  EN TP: reaching toward a hot oven
  tr TP: sıcak fırına uzanmak
  EN FP: reaching the top shelf
  tr FP: en üst rafa uzanmak
5180 | speaker (noun): someone who speaks to a group of people | loc: konuşmacı
  EN TS: The speaker is at the lectern.
  tr TS: Konuşmacı kürsüde.
  EN FS: The speaker is at the piano.
  tr FS: Konuşmacı piyanonun başında.
  EN TP: a speaker at a lectern
  tr TP: kürsüde bir konuşmacı
  EN FP: a speaker in the audience
  tr FP: seyirciler arasında bir konuşmacı
5181 | signature (noun): your name written in your own handwriting | loc: imza | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Her signature is in blue ink.
  tr TS: İmzası mavi mürekkeple.
  EN FS: Her signature is in red ink.
  tr FS: İmzası kırmızı mürekkeple.
  EN TP: a fresh blue signature
  tr TP: taze mavi bir imza
  EN FP: a signature on a cheque
  tr FP: çekte bir imza
5182 | achievement (noun): the action of finishing something difficult | loc: başarı
  EN TS: Look, the mural is her achievement.
  tr TS: Bak, o duvar resmi kızın başarısı.
  EN FS: Look, the mural is his achievement.
  tr FS: Bak, o duvar resmi oğlanın başarısı.
  EN TP: a big mural achievement
  tr TP: büyük bir duvar resmi başarısı
  EN FP: a video game achievement
  tr FP: bir video oyunu başarısı
5183 | passionate (adjective): showing very strong emotions | loc: tutkulu
  EN TS: So passionate, the chalk is flying!
  tr TS: Öyle tutkulu ki tebeşir uçuşuyor!
  EN FS: So passionate, the books are flying!
  tr FS: Öyle tutkulu ki kitaplar uçuşuyor!
  EN TP: a passionate old teacher
  tr TP: tutkulu yaşlı bir öğretmen
  EN FP: a passionate young singer
  tr FP: tutkulu genç bir şarkıcı
5184 | romantic (adjective): connected with love, making you feel love | loc: romantik
  EN TS: He proposed. So romantic!
  tr TS: Evlenme teklif etti. Çok romantik!
  EN FS: He sang. So romantic!
  tr FS: Şarkı söyledi. Çok romantik!
  EN TP: a romantic proposal
  tr TP: romantik bir evlenme teklifi
  EN FP: a romantic comedy film
  tr FP: romantik bir komedi filmi
5185 | kindness (noun): being considerate and sympathetic to others | loc: nezaket
  EN TS: Kindness keeps the man dry.
  tr TS: Nezaket adamı kuru tutuyor.
  EN FS: Kindness keeps the dog dry.
  tr FS: Nezaket köpeği kuru tutuyor.
  EN TP: kindness in the rain
  tr TP: yağmurda nezaket
  EN FP: kindness in the sun
  tr FP: güneşte nezaket
5186 | public (noun): people in general, taken as a whole | loc: halk
  EN TS: The public is in the square.
  tr TS: Halk meydanda.
  EN FS: The public is in the church.
  tr FS: Halk kilisede.
  EN TP: the public in the square
  tr TP: meydandaki halk
  EN FP: the public in the theatre
  tr FP: tiyatrodaki halk
5187 | wagon (noun): a wheeled vehicle pulled by a tractor or animal | loc: yük arabası
  EN TS: Strong boy! He's pulling a wagon!
  tr TS: Güçlü çocuk! Yük arabası çekiyor!
  EN FS: Strong boy! He's pulling a car!
  tr FS: Güçlü çocuk! Otomobil çekiyor!
  EN TP: pulling a farm wagon
  tr TP: çiftlik yük arabası çekmek
  EN FP: pulling a horse wagon
  tr FP: at arabası çekmek
5188 | disappointment (noun): the feeling when your expectations are not met | loc: hayal kırıklığı
  EN TS: A boot? Total disappointment.
  tr TS: Bot mu? Tam bir hayal kırıklığı.
  EN FS: A fish? Total disappointment.
  tr FS: Balık mı? Tam bir hayal kırıklığı.
  EN TP: disappointment on a jetty
  tr TP: iskelede hayal kırıklığı
  EN FP: disappointment at a zoo
  tr FP: hayvanat bahçesinde hayal kırıklığı
5189 | weather (noun): the state of the sky: sun, rain, wind, clouds | loc: hava
  EN TS: Weather check: still raining.
  tr TS: Hava kontrolü: yağmur hâlâ yağıyor.
  EN FS: Weather check: still snowing.
  tr FS: Hava kontrolü: kar hâlâ yağıyor.
  EN TP: checking the weather by hand
  tr TP: havayı elle kontrol etmek
  EN FP: the weather on TV
  tr FP: televizyonda hava durumu
5190 | windy (adjective): with a lot of wind blowing | loc: rüzgârlı
  EN TS: Windy? She loves it!
  tr TS: Rüzgârlı mı? Bayılıyor!
  EN FS: Sunny? She loves it!
  tr FS: Güneşli mi? Bayılıyor!
  EN TP: a windy seafront
  tr TP: rüzgârlı bir sahil
  EN FP: a windy mountain top
  tr FP: rüzgârlı bir dağ zirvesi
5191 | snowy (adjective): covered with snow or full of falling snow | loc: karlı
  EN TS: A flag on a snowy plain.
  tr TS: Karlı bir ovada bir bayrak.
  EN FS: A flag on a sandy beach.
  tr FS: Kumlu bir sahilde bir bayrak.
  EN TP: a snowy white plain
  tr TP: karlı, bembeyaz bir ova
  EN FP: a snowy city street
  tr FP: karlı bir şehir sokağı
5192 | horizon (noun): the far line where land seems to meet sky | loc: ufuk | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Only snow up to the horizon.
  tr TS: Ufka kadar sadece kar.
  EN FS: Only sand up to the horizon.
  tr FS: Ufka kadar sadece kum.
  EN TP: snow up to the horizon
  tr TP: ufka kadar kar
  EN FP: the sea on the horizon
  tr FP: ufukta deniz
5193 | rash (noun): red itchy spots on the skin | loc: kızarıklık
  EN TS: Cream on the rash? It stings!
  tr TS: Kızarıklığa krem mi? Yakıyor!
  EN FS: Cream on the burn? It stings!
  tr FS: Yanığa krem mi? Yakıyor!
  EN TP: cream on a red rash
  tr TP: kırmızı kızarıklığa krem
  EN FP: a rash on her cheek
  tr FP: yanağında bir kızarıklık
5194 | novel (noun): a long fictional story printed as a book | loc: roman
  EN TS: Guess who loves this novel?
  tr TS: Bil bakalım bu romana kim bayılıyor?
  EN FS: Guess who loves this film?
  tr FS: Bil bakalım bu filme kim bayılıyor?
  EN TP: reading a thick novel
  tr TP: kalın bir roman okumak
  EN FP: writing a novel
  tr FP: roman yazmak
5195 | bench (noun): a long seat for more than one person | loc: bank
  EN TS: His books take up the whole bench.
  tr TS: Kitapları bütün bankı kaplamış.
  EN FS: His shoes take up the whole bench.
  tr FS: Ayakkabıları bütün bankı kaplamış.
  EN TP: books on a park bench
  tr TP: park bankında kitaplar
  EN FP: a dog on a bench
  tr FP: bankta bir köpek
5196 | bun (noun): hair twisted into a round knot on the head | loc: topuz
  EN TS: Her bun and her book go everywhere.
  tr TS: Topuzu ve kitabı her yere onunla gidiyor.
  EN FS: Her bun and her dog go everywhere.
  tr FS: Topuzu ve köpeği her yere onunla gidiyor.
  EN TP: a blonde bun on top
  tr TP: tepede sarı bir topuz
  EN FP: a sweet bun
  tr FP: tatlı bir çörek
5197 | rebel (verb): to take part in a rebellion | loc: isyan etmek
  EN TS: The office is rebelling!
  tr TS: Ofis isyan ediyor!
  EN FS: The office is sleeping!
  tr FS: Ofis uyuyor!
  EN TP: rebelling against work
  tr TP: işe isyan etmek
  EN FP: rebelling against parents
  tr FP: ebeveynlere isyan etmek
5198 | sheet (noun): paper you write or print on | loc: kâğıt yaprağı
  EN TS: She is handing him a sheet.
  tr TS: Ona bir kâğıt yaprağı uzatıyor.
  EN FS: She is handing him a cup.
  tr FS: Ona bir fincan uzatıyor.
  EN TP: a small written sheet
  tr TP: küçük, yazılı bir kâğıt yaprağı
  EN FP: a sheet on a bed
  tr FP: yatakta bir çarşaf
5199 | follow (verb): to act in the way rules tell you | loc: uymak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: Recipe followed step by step.
  tr TS: Tarife adım adım uyuldu.
  EN FS: Map followed step by step.
  tr FS: Haritaya adım adım uyuldu.
  EN TP: following a handwritten recipe
  tr TP: el yazısı bir tarife uymak
  EN FP: following a friend online
  tr FP: bir arkadaşı internette takip etmek
5200 | lively (adjective): full of life and energy | loc: canlı
  EN TS: What a lively group!
  tr TS: Ne canlı bir grup!
  EN FS: What a lively dog!
  tr FS: Ne canlı bir köpek!
  EN TP: a lively living room
  tr TP: canlı bir oturma odası
  EN FP: a lively dance club
  tr FP: canlı bir dans kulübü
5201 | reflect (verb): to send an image or light back | loc: yansıtmak
  EN TS: The water reflects everything, including the volcano.
  tr TS: Su her şeyi yansıtıyor, yanardağı bile.
  EN FS: The water reflects everything, including the moon.
  tr FS: Su her şeyi yansıtıyor, ayı bile.
  EN TP: a volcano reflected in water
  tr TP: yanardağı yansıtan su
  EN FP: a face in a mirror
  tr FP: aynada bir yüz
5202 | put (verb): to set something down in a certain place | loc: koymak | checker: word_missing?
  EN TS: She put the whole shop in the fridge!
  tr TS: Bütün dükkânı buzdolabına koydu!
  EN FS: She put the whole shop in the oven!
  tr FS: Bütün dükkânı fırına koydu!
  EN TP: putting food in the fridge
  tr TP: yiyecekleri buzdolabına koymak
  EN FP: putting food on the table
  tr FP: yiyecekleri masaya koymak
5203 | relative (noun): a person related by blood or marriage | loc: akraba
  EN TS: The relatives have arrived!
  tr TS: Akrabalar geldi!
  EN FS: The relatives have left!
  tr FS: Akrabalar gitti!
  EN TP: relatives at the front door
  tr TP: kapıda akrabalar
  EN FP: relatives at an airport
  tr FP: havalimanında akrabalar
5204 | improve (verb): to make better | loc: iyileştirmek
  EN TS: The room has improved a lot.
  tr TS: Odayı epey iyileştirmişler.
  EN FS: The garden has improved a lot.
  tr FS: Bahçeyi epey iyileştirmişler.
  EN TP: improving an old room
  tr TP: eski bir odayı iyileştirmek
  EN FP: improving their English
  tr FP: İngilizcelerini iyileştirmek
5205 | oath (noun): a serious promise to tell the truth | loc: yemin
  EN TS: She is taking the oath.
  tr TS: Kadın yemin ediyor.
  EN FS: He is taking the oath.
  tr FS: Adam yemin ediyor.
  EN TP: taking an oath
  tr TP: yemin etmek
  EN FP: breaking an oath
  tr FP: yeminini bozmak
5206 | evidence (noun): your reason for belief or disbelief | loc: kanıt
  EN TS: She found the evidence!
  tr TS: Kanıtı buldu!
  EN FS: She lost the evidence!
  tr FS: Kanıtı kaybetti!
  EN TP: pinning up evidence
  tr TP: kanıtları panoya iğnelemek
  EN FP: hiding the evidence
  tr FP: kanıtları saklamak
5207 | sweat (noun): the salty fluid your skin lets out when hot | loc: ter
  EN TS: Big mountains, lots of sweat.
  tr TS: Koca dağlar, bol ter.
  EN FS: Big lakes, lots of sweat.
  tr FS: Koca göller, bol ter.
  EN TP: dripping with sweat
  tr TP: terden sırılsıklam
  EN FP: sweat after a sauna
  tr FP: saunadan sonra ter
5208 | cuisine (noun): a style of preparing food, or that food | loc: mutfak
  EN TS: Every cuisine amazes him!
  tr TS: Her mutfak onu büyülüyor!
  EN FS: Every drink amazes him!
  tr FS: Her içecek onu büyülüyor!
  EN TP: three different cuisines
  tr TP: üç farklı mutfak
  EN FP: just one cuisine
  tr FP: tek bir mutfak
5209 | lounge (verb): to sit or lie back comfortably doing nothing | loc: yayılmak
  EN TS: Nobody works; they are all lounging.
  tr TS: Kimse çalışmıyor; herkes yayılmış yatıyor.
  EN FS: Nobody works; they are all dancing.
  tr FS: Kimse çalışmıyor; herkes dans ediyor.
  EN TP: lounging in a hammock
  tr TP: hamakta yayılmak
  EN FP: lounging on a boat
  tr FP: teknede yayılmak
